Pinterest is, of course, one of the currently pervasive Internets Flavors-of-The-Month. Like all the others, it came, it’s exploded, it’s here, and it will undoubtedly go.
Choir in the States is not quite the same...
“They came up to us and immediately asked ‘Who hijacked you?’, ‘What kind of car was it?’, ‘Does it have a tracker?’” alleged Lamula. “We recognised them immediately.”
Make half a packet of spaghetti as per package direction. Drain and toss with the nut mixture.
Except, in this particular instance, I’m not annoyed by the beginning but, rather, by the end.
Diet Pepsi - I live off of caffiene, I keep a stash in the cupboard by my desk.
So. How does it still hurt when I know that she is with Jesus?
The dream needs to be interpreted along with the earlier ones. I am putting it in Dream Diary category. Hope the beautiful night brings solace and calms my yearning .
In the meantime, here’s my rallying cry at Terri’s – and you can also find out why I consider this much-editioned novel is a beacon for the indie publishing movement.
just discovered an awesome blog: www.hashai.com
I hope to be back in the studio soon but until then enjoy the roses (currently blooming in my front yard) and have a very Happy Mother's Day!!!
It's okay to cry babies.
Carotenoids are present in the chloroplasts along with chlorophyll and produce the yellow, orange, brown colors in fruits and flowers like bananas, daffodils, corn, and carrots. These colors can be readily seen in fruits and flowers because they are part of the reproductive system and not the vegetative system, and don't produce chlorophyll in their cells.
“Damn,” he whispered, hurrying to turn as cautiously as possible.
We met so many lovely Adelaidians...
I definitely agree with the result – Beyonce is gorgeous! And has only improved since the birth of Blue Ivy – new mothers are envious everywhere!
As you all in soul mature and grow to a FULL Blossom as Loves delicate petals on the most delicate/fragile and beautious flower as a Lotus a Rose a Daffodill etc…ALL are beautious as is EVERYTHING in Creation that was made in Pure Unconditional Love for GROWTH and Evolution to ALL things and BEings upon this Grand Emerald Ball you all at this time call “HOME”.
Hurry this is likely to go quickly! Just click the photo to be taken to print your coupon!
Normally I hate it. Now it seems I love it. Rewriting, that is.
The spine of the book and inbetween each page is a continuous thread of recycled sari silk yarn. This is multicoloured and not only represents the rainbow beyond which we find Oz, but also serves to hold the book open on display.
*Good service
Like the flooding Ganges
I was headed to the in-store cafe. Every other week the girls and I chatted over food. Today, we’d have something to chat about. His mother lingered at a display in front of the cafe. I only wanted to avoid a scene, and of course being seen. He couldn’t be more than eight-teen. I meandered the various displays, slipping closer and closer. Stealthily, I advanced toward the awaiting gossip. “Hello.” I was not invisible. A disapproving and pleasant grin fluttered from my lips. He glanced briefly down and exhaled relief. My eyes blinked slowly, concealing my rapid pulse. Display socks were nervously caressed between his finger and thumb. His mother Jewishly approached, and I departed into the cafe. He must be fourteen years younger than me. I glanced back briefly, searching for my breath, but only found his gaze.
Jeffries is a published sports blogger in So. California. He writes on pro sports, including the NFL, MLB, and some NBA. His special interests are sports biographies and opinionated commentary. As a former student athlete, with a cousin who played on the 2002 World Series champion Angels, he has been involved in sports for a long time. Enjoy reading him regularly by following him here at Wordpress, Facebook, Twitter, and Yahoo. He also has several articles listed on Google. Subscribe to his blog today!
P.S. I’ll show you how I painted the cabinets soon – and what I did that you should NOT. :)
If you haven't gone to see it yet, and you've read the books, and you're a big fan, and...well, I only have this advice to give: Bring KLEENEX TISSUES!
“It was right out of Henry V actually, a touch of Barry, in this case, in the night for those soldiers risking their lives over there,” Matthews said.
Let me just say: WOOOOO HOOOOO!!!!
I look away, out of the small pressured window to the expanse of blue, bright blue sky, which for me was already Californian despite being over the Irish Sea. A tear rolled down my freshly shaved cheek. I reached up and stroked it away and felt the tiniest amount of stubble coming through. My struggles as Diana were minuscule compared to the ones becoming Sy.
o Child psychologists
Mathew 7:15-28
Phillip and Henry Kissinger refer to us as “Useless eaters.”), so you
Last request, for now....
NICHOLSON KL. Should staff in long-stay hospitals for eldery patients be vaccinated against influenza? Lancet 2000; 355: 83-84.
The reclamation required in an examination of the story of Demeter and her daughter, Persephone, must be conducted on both the material and metaphoric realms in order for its message to be fully comprehended. This is the story first and foremost of the intense love and devotion of a mother for her daughter. It is also, however, one of the first examples of how the patriarchy takes a distinctly feminine narrative and alters it, not just for its own immediate benefit, but to shape all future narratives in service of that patriarchal agenda. Like the asphalt and carpets that have buried the once vibrant heart of natural and holistic civilizations, the stories of ourselves have also been painted over with foreign words. They have been left as dry, truncated husks - empty tomes whose only purpose is to serve the needs of political, social, economic and religious institutions bent on exercising authority and power over others.
Next up is a beautiful wall cabinet at Jennifer's house. She thought about painting it but ultimately decided to leave it since it was original to the house. I'm so glad she did! It's such a beautiful piece.
Please grab code from right side bar.
5. Preheat oven to 325 F. Roll one ball of dough out to very wide thin circle. Spread with a thin layer of the tahini mixture (I find it easiest to drizzle the tahini over, then sort of spread it with the back of the spoon). Starting at the longest edge, roll up the dough into a rope. Gently twist the rope so it is spiraled. Roll up the rope to a form a coiled bun. Gently flatten the bun with the rolling pin or a firm press of your hand. Place on a greased or lined baking sheet. Repeat with remaining dough.
A Suspicious
Sophia Rosen, owner as well as designer at SOPHIA has added elegant details in the floral adornment at the shoulder and hip, as well as the layers of silk that skim the floor and opera gloves to complete the glam look.
Jesus appeared to His disciples as they were rounding off an unsuccessful
On the inside of the card, I stamped Posh again, and added a Happy Birthday sentiment in Melon Mambo.
Last week I travelled to Montreal with my neighbour Erik Barr and my son Adam to pack up and ship some 400 cases of wood and metal type and the other printing gear belonging to my late friend Glenn Goluska. The collection will be integrated into our operations at Gaspereau Press.
Last appointment details: My last appointment was Friday, February 17th. Joseph’s h/b was 145. I am measuring at 30 cm which is a little behind, but it’s nothing to be concerned about. She checked me again since I’ve been having contractions daily. Still high, closed, long (cervix). So, no changes to my cervix at this point is a good thing.
- Judge dismisses Sean’s contention that he was involved in a forestry business in Derrylin by saying “he may well have walked some forestry lands leased to his children but a decision as to whether or not that forestry should be thinned not only does not constitute a business but is a decision of an hour or two”
Dressers in different types of wood furniture like mahogany, teak and pine can be bought at reasonable rates. Different styles of dressers are available in the online portals. Choosing the right type of home furniture can make a huge difference on the entire décor of your home.
I personally love the style of these jackets as when I first saw the Burberry Prorsum catwalk photographs I was immediately reminded of those vintage black and white photos of early female aviators from the 1930's in their leather jackets, flying caps and goggles. The aviatrix Amelia Earheart first came to mind because of the release of the film on her life last year. Along with their heroic achievements as women in a male dominated field Earheart and her contemporaries are credited with pioneering the original trend for the leather bomber jacket in fashion. Ever since it periodically resurfaces on the catwalks and is lauded as being a classic, timeless item.
How exactly do you run? What do you do?
Winter of ’44. Reitz has a fanatical captain attached to a propaganda unit at the front exclaim, “Did Dante really enter the Kingdom of Hell? Did Hieronymus Bosch see with his own eyes the Garden of Pleasure? … No! But the divine flame consumed them! The artist sees things according to his own inspiration. Do you know who said that? Our own minister, Dr. Goebbels. Does that surprise you? The true art of the 20th century is not the feature film, but the newsreel.” Geobbels, connected with Kristallnacht in 1938 and later with the Nazi Endlösung (Final Solution), pioneered the use of broadcasting for propaganda purposes. Reitz, no stranger to journalism, is persuaded otherwise, and points out that the most enduring works have been not documentaries, but works of fiction, or reenactments, such as those by Flaherty.
Obviously my parents get a shot of this cash. Not that they need it—all of the kids out of the house has made their lives pretty comfortable, financially-speaking—but this would alleviate some of the pressure for them to both bust their asses so much at work. They’re both nearing fifty, it’s about time they slow down a little bit. I’d like to think that a hundred Gs would be enough to calm ‘em down just a lil bit.
Love yourself and never ever let someone use you.
In small saucepan, melt butter, add flour and stir
and was now held back
The view from char minar was certainly a delight. The staircase to get up however was too narrow and steep. I guess architects forgot about people climbing up. Usual to the Indian standards the site was riddled with piques of paan (The banner of “Kindly Paint me red“ was the only sign missing, rest of the job was done fully well by the local tourist armed with their gutkas. This is specifically the case of staircase).
Response time will be maddeningly slow, probably six months. I'm sorry. Remember, though, I'm not asking for exclusivity, so submit elsewhere--just send an email if you're about to accept an offer so that I can rend my garments for missing out on your brilliance.
It should give me the right to call you mine.
But maybe he isn’t lying. Maybe he’s being funny. Maybe he’s just joking. If he’s sophisticated enough to pronounce the name “Nick”, he has to be sophisticated enough to understand the hilarity of an almost two year old boy blaming his stinky poo on a forty year old neighbor across the street. I don’t see any other possible explanation.
the boys have a christmas lunch so they'll have something light like toastie toasties
But this is a minor complaint. What we have here is another deliberate and carefully measured step along a well considered reinvention of what Doctor Who is and should be in the 1980s. For the first time in years we have a coherent vision of what Doctor Who is being executed with reliable competence by the production team. This is a crowning glory for the show.
For years the WWE has seemingly ignored the obstreperous clamoring of certain fans that have taken the company to task for defaming the legacy of women’s wrestling in sports entertainment. The message board diatribes and blog worthy musings of such analysts have indeed become legendary in their own right, often resulting in numerous fans tacitly agreeing that Vince McMahon could care less about allowing women to shine just as much (if not brighter) than their male counterparts.
- 6 Tbl. soy sauce
I create, share my lap while
Last weekend, I was coughing and hacking and feeling pretty close to death warmed over. I decided to take a nap at around 1 on Saturday--when I woke up around 4, I was informed that Big Daddy had invited some people over for a Barbeque.
Wonderful as Holmes's biography is, Bieri's crisp and authoritative take, published in 2004, brings the best of modern scholarship to bear on this brief but hectic life. Bieri fills out the detail, sees certain elements from a refreshing new angle and includes new information to intrigue the enthusiast. Not as sweepingly Romantic as the Holmes but worthy to sit beside it on the shelf.
The drying beans have had it rough. After planting them late because of the wet spring, the summer drought slowed their growth, and now, with such a wet fall, they're having a terrible time drying out. Many of the pods are mouldy and possibly a half will be discarded. We've picked them all, and they're spread out in our window-filled front room in hopes they'll finish drying before any other mould takes hold.
Link back to Creative Cats!
Welcome to Lesbians vs. Zombies: The Musical Revue. Each number in our lineup gives you not only different heroines but a different take on the zombie itself. Some of the girls are zombies. Some are neither zombie nor human. Most are humans trying to survive in a world gone unpredictable, where any shadow might hide nightmarish danger or unquenchable desire. Heat levels range from smoky-sweet to explosive.
There was only one not-particularly sharp photo of the machine and I didn't ask for another (I know, I know...). It looked OK to me.
Finally it appeared around the corner, next to an Air Malta operation, two complete desks dedicated to easyJet check-in, right next to the blocked off and inoperable automatic KABA gates leading to a closed and locked departure lounge entrance. I can’t tell you how many times a local resident hoping for a well practised quick exit would scoot around our corner at full speed heading for this blocked entry, but then foiled by the closure, would swear in the local dialect and then look for an alternate route to the airside area.
Rosey is on the tag laying down & Rosey fun time is the red haired girl in the back.
US author John Edgar Wideman, who recently decided to self-publish his latest book using Lulu, has a personal article in today's Publisher's Weekly Soapbox blog. While Wideman has spoken extensively on using Lulu for his book, Briefs, the article does reveal that it was actually Wideman's son, a writer and Lulu employee, who suggested the self-publishing service.
I spent most of yesterday crocheting....I want to make a blanket but first I thought I'd experiment with different yarns and patterns....
4) lightly sand
anyway, there's been so much going on, i'm not even sure where to start. i'll give you the "short version":
All in all - a lovely celebration and a great opportunity to marvel and think 'gosh I have wonderful friends and family...' :) xxx
A lot of people start out as interns and get promoted and end up staying with the company for a long time. But I’ve learned that it’s even really REALLY hard to get an internship especially because I don’t have a lot of experience to show them. I have some things to talk about but I only have a handful of solid examples that I can show them online or on paper.
I can't understand why they won’t pass,
And while I know that it is “better to have loved and lost, than to never have loved at all,” I also know that that it hurts like a cactus prick in the bottom of my foot.
She wasn't sure they would even stay on a stick, but the did, hahameow. and then there were the Jumbo Campfire marshmallows, that's livin' large.
I almost forgot to share the big news around here!
The boys are gone.
Yule-tide carols being sung by a choir
Many of my blog friends are doing the A-Z Challenge this month. I love the idea but didn´t want to post every day. So when I saw the same idea for a onetime post at Karin´s blog I knew I had to do it.
Accessories - Buttons - Blue collection, hemp
Then a seagull ate it.
Obama’s $15 Million Dinner with Clooney;
Elijah: "Okay. But could you only be a good guy? Don't be a bad soldier."
So that that morning when my labour began in the final hours of my second pregnancy I had some apprehension. The lovely thing about having a midwife, is that you can labour mostly at home, which is so good for women like me who pace and swear and need to be held my their mother and sit on the toilet for hours and pet the cat, and talk on the phone to their best friends through clenched teeth and convince their husband to call the midwife a dozen or so times to check that they are in fact not dying and all the other stuff that is much better at home and tends to ease the apprehension even if just a little bit.
--Do you plan on continuing to write flash fiction/short stories, or do you have aspirations for longer-form fiction?
Fortitude! That is a gift of the Holy Spirit through baptism.
Well there you go! That was fun. Mostly. Except for that painfully hard decision making stuff.
The image of young military personnel lined up at computer screens deep in a mountain side in Colorado, joystick in hand, dropping bombs on people they don’t even know and can’t really even see thousands of miles away on the other side of the world based on “patterns of behavior” is not my image of America. It is not what I conjure up when I think of the home of the brave. It is most definitely not what John Winthrop envisioned when he told his fellow settlers in the Massachusetts Bay Colony, “For we must consider that we shall be as a city upon a hill. The eyes of all people are upon us.”
All of the language explaining the need to amend the state constitution circles around the concept that if we don’t make this change to define marriage then marriage will remain undefined and open to all. I’m still having trouble grasping how this is a bad thing. I’m actually having trouble understanding how anyone else’s marriage has any bearing whatsoever on my own. If the couple down the street splits up, I’m still a married person. If they never get married at all, I’m still very married. No one else’s marriage changes or affects the state of mine – and mine is really none of anyone else’s business.
As I was having quite many fun places to experience in 2011 so I'm hoping for much more fun and adventurous places to visit in 2012. If you would like to see my 2010 highlights and achievements you can read it in my fashion blog Two Thousand Things.
The first ever Pakistani Girl to represent Pakistan on Sa Re Ga Ma Pa Show in India. She has also visited China and other countries for singing. She started singing when she started speaking! But, She started learning classical singing properly since 2006 from Alhamra Arts Council,Lahore, Pakistan under a notable and qualified teacher, Sir Abdul Rauf. Her favorite singer is Nayyara Noor from Pakistan. She has performed in hundreds of shows and TV programs and has hosted many programs in various TV Channels.She talks about her dream to become a legendary playback singer.
So I enlisted the help of Matt and Bristol's Uncle Mike ( he built the fridge) to make her kitchen awesome. With a suggestion from my friend Sarah we added a spice rack. Then we added hooks for pot holders, made the front of her fridge magnetic, and put on a real faucet unit.
Theist: Even Darwin himself said that he feared no fossils would ever be found. When did Darwin die? wasn’t it about 160 years ago or near that? To think protein appears and does its thing is so far-fetched no wonder evolution is taught in secret. They sneak it into textbooks like they did with that lie of the Piltdown man. Too late it was taught for a generation to kids that were basically brainwashed to believe a lie. No offense intended to you.
The airport was due to open on June 3.
What a fun way to teach the rules about short & long vowels! I think this is really going to work for my kiddos.
864 *D-IX/19/1983. Interview of George Anastaplo. Conducted by Alex Kotlowitz, National Public Radio. (Incorporated in Item C-1986(6), above, pp. 640-42.)
1) Prioritize my prayer/quiet time.
Our politicians, for the most part, are not our politicians. Neither are our journalists, academics, and bureaucrats serving us.
Its evil deeds
Future Capital is on the block as well for majority sale.With fashion gone, what Biyani has is the erstwhile subsidary of Pantaloon Retail – Future Value Retail, and a few minor businesses like Hometown, ezone etc, all of which are struggling.
A few months after that I was picked up again, and in the hearing they told the whole story of my escape from the foster home in North Carolina. The court reporter was laughing under her breath as she typed (I’m not making this up). My friend Evelyn was present and requested to be my guardian, so the judge said that he reluctantly would grant her custody, and I would have a curfew. I broke it almost immediately and Evelyn could not keep track of me. I called her after disappearing for a couple of days, and she said, “Please don’t tell me where you are, so I won’t have to lie to the officer when he calls. But do you need some money or food or anything?” I laughed to myself, wondering how she could help me if I didn’t say where I was. But I told her I was fine.
It seems like an impossibility to change the media perception about my involvement in this case even though it’s false. They served their purpose by framing an innocent man at the beginning of the Breivik saga and now they want to ignore the real truth because it conflicts with their initial lies and smears.
In reality, the Dems and Republicans represent about 30% of the electorate each. The other 30% or so is made up of Independents and other smaller parties. We always expect the Dems and the GOP to vote accordingly, but it's the Indies that win elections. And right now they are not happy with the state of the nation, as it applies to their lives.
I come to fulfill the law...
“You love your country
According to a news paper article I recently read states that because of all the construction on the sewers and interstate near my house many hundreds of thousands of rats are running loose through my area of the city and are seeking shelters near or in homes. ( like ours). You can see them running around at night in back yards where children play. Our city is not doing much about it either. They have put hundreds of lbs of rat poison in the sewers but the rats are not found there they are in neighborhoods like mine.
Focus: Is there any danger of emerging of nationalistic formations on the Balkans – as the neo-Nazi party Golden Dawn entered the Greek parliament?
And the master (okay, only) bedroom:
7. Carlos Tevez (Manchester City)
As a matter of fact, the weather was pretty severe this year. I’m sure you’ve heard of all the tornadoes that swept through the state that flattened some towns and took the lives of a few people. I was in Illinois for the weekend and happily missed out on all the excitement.
We are thisclose to having the navy bathroom, aka the Pool Bathroom, complete. Sure the trim and cabinets need another coat of paint, but with boys in the house, I need every bathroom I can get! So we're busy hanging all the accessories and putting it back together. (You can read about why the sudden renovation here. And the progress here, here and here. And the door color debate here. And if you're still with us, read about the final round of problems and solutions here and here.)
With that in mind, I ought to bring some theatre up in these here STEM parts and put on a double dippin’ show. I think I’m going to mess around on one of these computers like I’m designing a robot or something. Ha!
Got out of condo at about 8:30 AM. Being unsure about where your going and not knowing how to get there makes even a simple trip an adventure. After all if you know where your going and how no get there there are usually, unless you are unbelievably stupid, no decisions left that would impede your goal. But an adventure by its very nature means most decisions you make could force abandonment of the voyage and require you to return home.
Music has always had a major impact in my life. It has soothed me through my most trying times, and provided peace through the troubled waters. The Lord has softened my hearth through beautiful music.
3. In a medium-low heated Tawa/Skillet, add butter.
Ref: Picture II Kalighat, Kali & ‘She was there in the meadow when the creeks used to rise/ blinded by sleep and in need of a bed’- lines from Bob Dylan song ‘Isis’.
1 1/4 cups whipping (heavy) cream
all in need of reform and a source of new wealth.
but then something changes and the light burns out.
Today is the Character Interview Blogfest. I've chosen to interview the main character from my fantasy novel The Shard. It's tough, because Midas is a fairly serious fellow, so it's not easy to get anything funny out of him. I decided to interview him a few years prior to the start of the novel (it would be interesting to do an after-novel interview someday).
Loves it when you blow raspberries or make farting sounds with your mouth
Our Valentine's day was very simple but lots of love and wonderful feelings. First of all, my husband bought me a rose and set it up on a table with a message on a table the night before Valentine's day so I will find it in the morning of Valentine's day. I couldn't sleep well that night so I ended up finding it at 3:00am. It made me feel so happy and loved.
But besides this, I have an appointment set up on Tuesday with the pastor of my parents’ church to discuss me pursuing chaplaincy; I really regret telling him I was interested in pursuing a Catholic path. I kept thinking to myself while writing that e-mail, “Don’t put that, don’t do it, you’re going to really regret this later.” And I really, really do regret it, because now I have to show up to our meeting and explain to him that even though I admire Catholicism, I 1) absolutely 100% do not and cannot believe in Jesus, period and 2) I just disagree with Church Catechism, it’s unreal. I have contaced a Covenant of the Goddess officer to ask about gaining credentials/endorsement for chaplaincy, and have received a reply back, but I am slowly learning more about my options as a Wiccan.
Wolfgang Hampel, Monica Sone's friend, author of Betty MacDonald biography, winner of first Betty MacDonald Memorial Award sent his very special birthday wishes:
The stamp on this card, YES! It's only 1 stamp. :) It's a new background stamp that's coming out tomorrow at our stamp release party. I think I'll name it falling stars. I originally thought of it for a Christmas stamp but I'm lovin how it turned out for a Birthday card! the silver is my silver sailor pen and the dots that look kinda black are actually purple rhinestones. The whole card just blings in real life! :)
Now, Jax must take matters into her own hands by recruiting a militia to defend the frontiers—out of the worst criminals, mercenaries, and raiders that ever traveled through grimspace…
Powerful indeed.
I'm going to attempt to update this blog Mondays, Wednesdays, and Fridays.
I didn't even go back and reread what I had already written to gauge how it was sounding because from previous experience I knew that it either a.) would read like a NY Times best seller that might as well be already on a shelf (in my glory moments) or b.) was made of suckage and needed to be rewritten immediately (does See Spot run count?). And either way, I knew it was a skewed way of looking at things, so I decided to write with abandon.
OG: "MOOOOOOOOOOOOOMMMMMMM!!!!!!!!! It's a SHARK!!!!!! I FOUND A DEAD SHARK!!!! COME SEE!!! COME SEE!!!
However, the work, I believe, focuses more on energy than spectacle, on the incredible smallness of a democracy rather than the often discussed terrible face of government. The podium could easily be in a room behind an Inglewood store front but its scale suggests it could rise to much more. Leadership, I often forget, often starts with homemade pompoms and mirrors, and I was reminded of this by Newkirk.
I have a serious love of vintage linens. I had a whole bunch of pieces of vintage sheets leftover from other projects (and also purchased some vintage fat quarters on Etsy) and decided to make this lovely quilt! Well, I'm not actually a quilter, so this one is really just tied with a little piece of yarn where all the squares meet.
Too drunk to fuck ya!
Come out and look for Mom's Connection! We will be making pirate flags with the children and giving out lollipops! We will also be giving out bags to parents to help them carry all the crafts their children will be making!
Umbrella: YR00, YR12
And Yelland… despite his addiction, saw his career rise and rise. This is so unlike someone addicted to drugs, which tend to go the opposite direction. Could the matter of one substance being legal but not the other be a factor in this major difference?
Why is this "being a housewife" thing so twisted and emotional when honestly, I can admit that it is a blessing to be able to do it?
Are you white? Yup, him too.
palm Sugar - 1 cup
Reading 1, Acts 20:28-38
Of course, the problem is that I tend to read things far too fast, and I was worried that I wouldn’t have any points to bring up about reading the book because it would be far in my foggy past (April of 2010). The only thing I wrote about it on GoodReads was “John Green and David Levithan are so good at making the world seem full of potential goodness, while staying true to the suckiness of life. Every time I read one of their books my heart grows 3 sizes. It’s gotten to the point where I have a medical condition.” Ha ha! Good one, me.
Shelf life : 3 years
PRETORIA: General Richard Mdluli to face criminal charges after corruption in South Africa’s Crime Intelligence Unit.
Opening Reception: Saturday, April 26 (7-10PM)
Annette In Oz
Looking for a canvas of a painting not shown on the website? It is likely available anyway, just ask them at popgallery.manager@me.com Open edition canvases are great if you missed out on the limited editions. For example "Marie Masquerade" has long sold out as a hand embellished limited edition, but you can always get a signed open edition! Open Editions are not numbered or hand embellished, but they're the next best thing!
Rustie – Reflector
This model was criticised for many reasons, not least of which is that they are not logical levels. This article (click here) by Andy Bradbury deals with the key objections. I agree this is not a system of logical levels. I do find the distinctions useful, however. I can see the usefulness of aligning someone's sense of identify with what they want to contribute to the world, for example. I can see the usefulness of aligning one's values and beliefs with what they want to be, do and have. I wonder. What if we thought of these entities as layers of congruence, perhaps? Or, perhaps not even layers. Perhaps simply ingredients in the mix.
In this theory of sorrow, sorrow is projectively restored to reality as not only a reflective index, but a perfectible operation of the universal, a way forward into new reality. The sorrow of being, in the mystical mode of a most radical sorrow that one is, is not an affective byproduct of knowledge, but the very means of intensifying knowledge of the real, of actually realizing its truth. Touching at once the wondrous general fact of being (Why something instead of nothing?) and the horror of individuation (Why am I me?), the sorrow of being follows the dark but inversely paradisical path along the twisted root that grounds all entities to the outside. Sorrow reveals the ‘twist’ of the root as the total cosmic complication of the individuated entity: its ultimate confounding of distinctions as to what is inside/outside, self/world, creature/creator. In the context of the speculative realist will to escape the correlation of self and world, the sorrow of being is not simply a passion, but the digestible substance of facticity, the unavoidable portal through which
The Prof will be hosting the next Beer Dinner at The Courthouse Restaurant in Berwick on Friday November 13 and those lucky enough to hook a spot will be treated to some very nice Oktoberfest and Oktoberfest style beers along with some traditional fare and some modern takes on some old favourites as well.
Apron: thrifted
-John Edwards is much better prepared than he was 4 years ago. Which makes sense since that’s the only reason he has even been in politics is to run for president. Again…I don’t think he’s electable, especially since his message is to those ‘disadavantaged’ in America. Oops…they don’t vote in large numbers.
We mixed and matched, left to my own devices I'd have stuck to the Vietnamese stuff but AS had a craving for crispy duck. A quarter duck and a Vietnamese pancake was clearly far too much food for a starter as both were enormous, a theme that would continue with the mains. Be warned.
China said Wang Lijun, deputy mayor of Chongqing and protege of one of the nation’s most powerful leaders, spent one day in the US consulate in Chengdu earlier this week, fueling speculation about a political shakeup. China’s official Xinhua News …
These and other matters are topics on which PatLit will be delighted to hear from readers. If anyone would like to write a critique of Nicola's post which this weblog can host, can such person please email me here and let me know.
captives - including Art and Tripio - in front of the
One day they may go back to being just chairs and that's okay, but for now - one is a
Today a page about my daughter Tessa.
DISCLAIMER:
There also had been no forms drafted yet for appeals of approval of those claiming to be exempt from the Commissions jurisdiction. I tried to keep them to one page or two, limiting, in the case of appeals, the information required to basic items, such as the identity of the appellant and the project, trusting the regional commissions file to provide the starting point for any staff analysis. In other words I wanted to make it as easy as possible to get the things into our hot hands. I did not want things going away because someone, applicant or concerned citizen believed the process appeared to be too daunting. To me this approach was not just an exercise in governmental simplification and responsiveness but was also a means of control.
"You'll have to be careful."
And then it started.
Quote of the day: There are two educations. One should teach us how to make a living and the other how to live. - John Adams
Pickled ginger that accompanies sushi is called gari, and is meant to be a palette cleanser between rolls. The pink colour is occurs when young ginger is placed in an acidic liquid (vinegar). Unfortunately, most commercially produced ginger is artificially dyed and contains refined sweeteners.
It was a cheap place to hole up for a few months and get some serious work done. The glorious weather, perfect beaches, and competitively priced drinks were just a bonus.
coli;
HOW COULD THEY COVER UP A MASS KILLING OF THIS SCOPE?
Image: House Mouse - I cheated again and used a sticker, though someone will undoubtedly compliment me on my colouring job ;).
04 Makin' Out
2010.08.20 Pakistan Sanghar 1 0 A leader of the peaceful Ahmadi sect is shot in the head by orthodox Sunni.
the whisper your health
What a wonderful surprise Lee & I got today! I had a friend stop by with a homemade card, a heartfelt letter, a special book and flowers for Lee & I. Lee's favorite flower! I loved them too but most of all loved the little book. It has an uplifting message I can use each day. And it can be used over again each year. Her letter touched my heart and I will cherish it forever.
You say you love America but why don't you help America out instead of helping car dealerships where no one can afford to buy one.
I will probably also be joining Paul in job hunting, so if you could also pray that there is a homeschooling-compatible position available for me out there somewhere, that would be greatly appreciated.
"I swear not to say a word about what we do in this game to anyone outside..."
I nod with a little smile that tells him I’ve been waiting for him to ask that question all along.
Uncle Jack and Aunt Liz, they divorce a few years later. I hear about how Jackie tries to take her life because her boyfriend broke up with her. My perception of happy family shatters like brick thrown into mirror.
In a 10" cast-iron skillet (one of my favorite kitchen tools), I added 2 Tablespoons of buttah on medium heat. the apples are cooked on each side for 3-4 minutes each. Next, I add 1/4 cup brown sugar and some cinnamon and then I added another "secret ingredient" of my own.
Premise: A man begins an investigation into his wife’s mysterious death, only to find that it goes much deeper than he imagined.
“What’s the point of all this if you’re not going to let it change you?”
Bring it on, Spring! Now I’m ready for you!
'Reason' and 'meaning' are then formed from what is found in the combination of ones' favorite personal experiences of observable reality and ones' personal history of experienced reality with ones' favorite versions of other peoples' stories about their history of experienced reality.* Doesn't mean the result will be right, but you'll get a reason and a meaning you can understand.
#2: I don't really know what to say after that. Except that hunting for jobs is no fun. Really. This is the very first time in my job career that I've had three interviews, but no solid job offers. High ho, high ho, it's retail or food I go.
Main purpose of the Relocations Consultant role
PROSPECTS: Might make some inroads among art house habitués and senior moviegoers, a group often neglected by Hollywood. The trailer also made it look heartwarming and funny.
Anida Yoeu Ali and Masahiro Sugano were excited when they heard about the White House video contest on issues affecting Asian Americans and Pacific Islanders. They spent two weeks putting together a three-minute film on the plight of Cambodian deportees, then watched as online views outpaced the competition.
I have excellent music karma which has aided me in the past and will likely continue to do so (does citing music karma cause one to lose some?). I recall one extreme example at my only time seeing New Order. My friends and I had lawn seats at whatever their calling Starplex in Dallas these days, but having laid in a surfeit of good relations with the security staff, we were able to slip up to the front section for the openers (808 State, Stereo MCs) and then neglected to leave. When New Order hit the stage, we had managed to worm our way up to 3rd row from which seats we were never kicked (silly non-showing up ticket holders). After a pretty good show, which ended slightly early in that Bernard Sumner stalked off stage before the (according to the setlist we snatched from the stage) final song of the encore "Blue Monday" (my heart breaks), we were too hopped up to just leave. So I and one friend ran around the back of the venue, crawled under a gate, and insinuated ourselves with a group of lucky people escorted backstage to meet the band.
Ada Howard is the wife of the preacher and has a lot of responsibilities. She hasn't been making time for herself recently. After Ada hears that her 25 yr college reunion is coming up she decides to lose weight to impress an old boyfriend. Ada outlines her journey and new ways of living healthy in each chapter. This was an excellent read. The author manages to keep it light and fun as Ada rediscovers herself and her body.
It’s getting closer.
It is said that on a still day, the prisoners could hear music and laughter drifting across the bay from the mainland.
Trust no Future, howe'er pleasant!
safe
If we did not so readily garble up, so readily demand such trash as we see on TV today, it would not be there. It’s as simple as that. The media, televisions sole goal is to satisfy the consumer. I mean how much would you pay for 50 cable channels full of stuff you don’t want to watch. That’s right! You’d pay nothing. TV doesn’t put out anything that the general public does not enjoy to watch, does not demand. If they did they would certainly go out of business.
Stop by and take a look
4. Another pinecone went in the upper right and a strip of burlap from Hobby Lobby was tied into a small bow and affixed to the wreath with a wire ornament hook.
MISS TEEN DREAM FUN FACTS PAGE!
The Postal Museum has lots of information on the Mr. Zip campaign launched to help promote the use of Zip Codes when they were instituted in 1963. Although he began his life in an ad for Chase Manhattan Bank, and was later acquired by AT&T, Mr. Zip became the face of Zip Codes and the US Postal Service for many years.
Drop Three is coming back to refry the beans of your heart and dip your funny bone in tequila. Come on out to Spotlighter’s Theatre on Saturday May 5th at 11pm for late night comedy filled with improvisation and sketches stacked high like a 7 layer dip of awesome. Join us!
I want you to ask yourself these questions….
The message to girls: You can be a spoiled little brat if you are beautiful and don’t dress conservatively but you have no real power unless you are married to a man, regardless of how evil he is. Ahem, enter Jafar.
The painting above is a class demo I did a few weeks ago, and it depicts an alleyway in Winters. I did a little glazing after it was dry, so it wasn't entirely done in one sitting.
The Health and Safety Executive, Environment Agency and Office of Rail Regulation are looking to appoint a list of advocates to conduct their higher court prosecution work and other regulatory advocacy.
At night I pray….
After the photos of Park Yoochun who plays the role of Lee Gak and Han Ji Min who plays the role of Park Ha in SBS’s “Rooftop Prince” was made public, netizens commented, “Great, very matching,” “Very excited seeing the right collarbone of Park Yoochun,” “Very envy of Han Ji Min,” “Rooftop Prince rocks,” and etc.
Any Ideas you would like us to try on Paper Craftorium?
Moon - The next difficult task performed by the character is given a bonus of +10.
My kid is broken.
Things realllyyyy heated up on ‘Dancing With The Stars‘ last night!
Slivers of sunlight
The following embellishment was created by layering different elements together. I started with some Tim Holtz tissue tape (I changed the color with Distress Ink), added a starbust punched shape, followed by a Tim Holtz gear, a punched star, a Tim Holtz game spinner, and finally a brad to hold it all together. Then I trimmed the tape with some pinking sheers.
3) You don't have to follow my blog to win, but I sure would appreciate it if you would. For another entry, leave me another comment telling me you are NOW a follower or ALREADY one.
As my concept of “Princess Haiku” deepened, it became a journey into the world of fine arts, expressing universal concepts of beauty. The book, dance and music reviews on my space are for the most part original, although I sometimes reference the works of others. Additionally, I post my own haiku and prose musings.
Nunoue T et al. Human fetal infection with parvovirus B19: maternal infection time in gestation, viral persistence and fetal prognosis. Pediatr Infect Dis J 2002; 21: 1133-1136.
The Distress Crackle paint is another favourite of mine, goodness I have so many. When dry this crackles and I tend to use this on fences or sometimes around the edges, it really depends on the look I want. I have used this in green further into the tutorial.
Then Andrew disappears. Lorelei has to save him, even if that means facing a past she’d like to forget – and taking on a teacher who’s a real witch.
Was it … well, you get the point. They were all great. Every single one. It was a career like Aaron's or Musial's or Gehrig's -- an annual barrage of greatness.
This post from the Market My Words blog was just too hilarious not to share. After all, we all need a good laugh when it comes to the touchy subject of rejection. Who knew that getting a rejection was akin to the world of dating?
Being a bit of a germaphobe, when I saw those beds I immediately vowed never to use them… hah! what a load of crap. I was so glad for those beds, which are HEATED by the way. So while I was napping and getting slightly feverish this bed kept me quite toasty. Too toasty, maybe. I was shivering for my next two classes at any rate.
As a single mom, I’m constantly doing something and if I’m on the phone, you better believe domestic chores are getting done! So typically I try to do dishes, laundry, cleaning off the table, etc while I’m on the phone. I don’t want to waste any time, you know?
Thank you all for your comments, e-mails, facebook comments and thoughts. As always, this blog served it's purpose today. It helped me re-cap a situation, so I didn't have to tell the story to my family ten times! It also helped me get out emotions that would have otherwise consumed me.
This was a pretty funny story about a bunch of old heroes trying to bring about the end of the world by “returning fire to the gods” in the form of a giant bomb. It also had Rincewind, Leonard of Quirm, the librarian and the patrician trying to stop them. It was a solid adventure story.
This definitely has made me think about how I use my time. But it's also got me thinking about how little time I really spend with organizing, cleaning, and keeping house in general.I do use my work lunch break to do a lot of planning for grocery shopping and thinking about colors and new ideas for the house (and calling my dad). I'm pretty sure I forgot some things just now, but that's everything that I can think of.
6. Danny Boy (1999) - The Irish Tenors
“Did they skip that English class or something?”
The Christian Endeavor Society Pledge, Principles, and Practices
The reconfiguring of our view of the antagonists in the Ring War begins early in the novel. Consider the book’s best chunk of writing, this description of Mordor from Chapter 2:
I pray that each of my brothers and my sister will take time to fondly remember times we have shared. But most of all, I want them to know that our bond is strong. I love each of them with an unconditional love and thank God for the bond we share daily. Sharing those two hours with all of them, was indeed a gift that will grow in my heart long after all the decorations are tucked neatly away and the seasons change.
Are better than a Hallelujah sometimes.
I haven't been this excited since the seventh Harry Potter book came out! (And that's saying something!) It seriously may be my new favorite book. Oh my gosh. Not only is the plot interesting and original, the writing is vivid and descriptive and I felt as if I was watching a movie. I wouldn't be surprised if this does turn into a movie someday. The characters were gripping and realistic, and I found myself attached to them almost from the very beginning.
17 - Sabbath Bloody Sabbath intro only Paranoid
The world teaches birth control. Tragically, many of our sisters subscribe to its pills and practices when they could easily provide earthly tabernacles for more of our Father’s children. We know that every spirit assigned to this earth will come, whether through us or someone else. There are couples in the Church who think they are getting along just fine with their limited families but who will someday suffer the pains of remorse when they meet the spirits that might have been part of their posterity. The first commandment given to man was to multiply and replenish the earth with children. That commandment has never been altered, modified, or canceled. The Lord did not say to multiply and replenish the earth if it is convenient, or if you are wealthy, or after you have gotten your schooling, or when there is peace on earth, or until you have four children. The Bible says, “Lo, children are an heritage of the Lord: “. . . Happy is the man that hath his quiver full of them. . .” (Ps. 127:3, 5.) We believe God is glorified by having numerous children and a program of perfection for them. So also will God glorify that husband and wife who have a large posterity and who have tried to raise them up in righteousness. Conference Report, April 1969, Pg.12
“What the planners are unlikely to appreciate, for all their cleverly worded ‘mitigation measures,’ is that the Cailleach represents the whole landscape.
Wow! Have you ever had so much stuff happen in one week that you didn't even know where to start? Yep, that's me this week.
But enough about me, I have my own blog to babble about myself. This is wallflowers blog so it’s not the place to talk about myself. But on the other side… Wallflower asked me to blog on her blog for her. So why can’t I talk a bit about myself right?
Preparation
Under the current system in England and Wales, it is open to anyone to make an application for a copy of the documents on the court file. But that is a costly step to take for a discretionary order and, facing a risk of costs orders, it is a step that would only be taken where there is a substantial commercial, rather than academic or forensic, reason for doing so.
I am so glad I hung out in punk clubs while I was cutting school and being “very disappointing” because I had “so much potential” It makes me laugh now. Most of the time sitting in school was listening to teachers go on about themselves. I had a teacher that liked to talk about how much he related with “Porkys” the movie, why? Or the female teacher who would do exercises in low-cut dresses in front of junior high boys? WTF? Is wrong with people?
Here are some close-ups.
With rivulets between each row
I started feeling grunty at the ends of contractions. My brain said “I bet it’s a lip.” But not long after I felt very pushy. I went to the loo and after having a contraction in there I declared “I’m getting in.” I climbed in and it felt utterly gorgeous. I shut my eyes and swayed from side to side, zoning out completely.
away-
She's showing off her goodies--Micky Bandaids. Does it get better than this? In her world--not much better! You can also see the new finger paints---yaaaayyyy (what the H-E-Double hockey sticks was I thinking???).
Eventually our candles are whispered out by the breeze of time.
Finally, a group of Christians in Haibasa district in Jharkhand state were forced to leave their village after a series of attacks by local villagers. The Christians took refuge at a local church but at last report are living without necessities. In the last of the attacks, the violent mob shut down all exit points to the village before assaulting Christians with iron rods, axes, arrows and other sharp weapons, severely beating four Christians. Other believers, including children, were locked in a room where the assailants attempted to burn them alive. Thankfully police arrived before they could carry out the murders.
I think in this day and age, we are conditioned to think everything Mediterranean is better for us – olive oil, hummus (mmmm), etc. – but I wanted to know WHY!
Never fear though, below are a few stretches that will help alleviate strain in the neck and shoulders you can do anywhere, anytime:
Cobalamin supplementation has been shown to improve male fertility. Depression, dementia, and mental impairment are often associated with deficiencies of both cobalamin and folic acid. Folic acid may reduce the odds of cervical or colon cancer in certain risk groups.
To: McGuire, Lisa E.
* Governor Johnson; the governor John Kerry, senator from Massachusetts
This year’s theme is Yet Another World, which is kind of dystopia but that’s an oversimplification. What is it really? Watch this space and I’ll report back.
The sand changed to coarse dirt, with pebbles and sticks. More and more trees filled Mellie’s vision. Bushes scraped against her bare legs and slapped her face as she moved deeper inside a forest of eucalyptus and redwood trees. She winced in pain as a razor-sharp rock sliced her foot. Stopping to nurse it, she wished once again for her forgotten shoes.
Books on the resurrection
I hope you have a WONDERFUL day today.
Embossing Folder: Craft Concepts "Diamond Shadows" (a £1 bargain at the craft show - brilliant!)
1 T peanut butter
Jackson further says that a whole generation of white men were indoctrinated with hatred.
Well, its been a little over a week since we threw Charlie and Ryder’s Circus birthday party. It was a fun party for everyone, and even more fun to plan, in a chaotic crazy sort of way. We had carnival games, bouncy castle, cotton candy and an incredible Big Top cake, made by a friend.The kids and their friends ran around stuffing themselves full of Swedish berries and carrot sticks, trying to play games but mostly jumping for joy on the bouncy castle that my brother-in-law’s friend so graciously lent us.It really was a great time.I’m certain by the wide-eyed looks and huge grins that we received when our kids arrived and saw everything, that we won parents-of-the-year that day!
Billy Ocean – Red Light Spells Danger
And I got this last week. A copy of the revised manuscript, marked up with editing comments and invisible red hearts (as well as two visible pink ones.) (Note: I'm not sure all the mentees get invisible red hearts. I think Susan might be the only one who gives those.)
But wait! She survived! Not too damaged, I hoped. She found a perch on the ceiling fan, which is about 20 feet up in the air. And there she sat. With absolutely no intention of moving.
Now, I've heard that not everyone has a difficult time going through the threes. Perhaps my children struggle because they are the product of two people who were described as "stubborn", "hard-headed", and "strong-willed" as children. Today, we delight in the fact that we are now called "dedicated", "passionate" and "committed". A good reminder that traits that may seem negative in childhood can blossom into very positive traits in adulthood! So, you may have more mellow, easy-going children who transition quite easily through this stage. But, for the rest of you, I hear you.
“Evidence?” I spluttered.
We would play chess and read books together. I would tell her of the worlds I came up for the local kids. Places she could visit through my stories, but never frolic in with the others because of her condition and their brutalities. Once, we saw a cartoon version of The Hobbit and talked about it for days afterward. I, of course, thought it was pretty cool when Gandalf would get his mojo working.
looks like he was pitching at boise state on his 1979 topps card. after his stellar 1978 season, forster had some arm troubles in 1979 and appeared in only 17 games. he was 1-2 with 2 saves and had only one plate appearance on the year - just like rhoden. and, like rhoden, his obp for the year was 1.000, although forster managed a walk rather than a base hit.
On the other hand, people enjoy sharing the knowledge and experience they gain with others. People write, people sing, people tell each other endlessly about whatever interests, concerns, frightens or enlightens them, and as our technological possibilities expand we see that humanity has embraced the internet to connect with as many other people as possible to share whatever they feel is important for them. We all love expressing ourselves, we all love being listened to and we all appreciate what others have to say, in as far as the message can intersect with our own perceptions of reality.
Tomorrow is my last day at the office. Today my officemates surprised me with a plastic bucket filled with sunscreen, bug bite meds, baby wipes, a sewing kit, a map of Texas with the route between here and there highlighted, band aids, a flashlight with a blinking “Find Me” LED and an Us Weekly. Several things I can take off my shopping list now.
“The defendants stand charged based not upon any words or beliefs they might espouse, but based upon their own plans and actions,” U.S. Attorney Steven Dettelbach said in a statement.
Level 3: Weapon ATT: +3, Accuracy: +1%, Proc Rate: 47%, Deals 169% damage 2 times.
An oldie, but a goodie. "Bordel de merde" is what you say when you drop a crystal glass. It's what you say when you walk in human excrement. This one, can help you survive many a catastrophe. If you're anything like me, the occasional swear word is a release, it gets the anger out of you before you let it out on someone.
Time is flying so quickly! I cannot believe that week one of training for the Cleveland Marathon is already done. It was a great training week and I can only hope that the rest of training goes as smoothly (HA!).
Random people ordered them with their fish and chips over the course of the years. There was no typical pickled egg consumer. Young, old, affluent, breadline. A gasp in the queue always followed that rare occasion when someone said 'Cod and chips please. Oh, and a pickled egg.'
I kept an eye on the traffic signal as I craned my neck to catch a glimpse of her. I could see her well manicured, white gloved hands tap an impatient tune against the handlebar as she waited for the green light.
I created several categories, and started at the top, picking the movies that fit into the most esteemed category (“Movies I’d want to own”). Once I’d divvied them all out, I was able to then rank the more manageable groups within their subsets.
If I were to go around the sanctuary this morning and ask you to share a story about one person who made a difference in your life, we would be here quite a while. For some of us that person was a parent. For others of us it was a teacher. For some it was a boss or someone at work. And yet for others, it was a coach or a family member or a friend.
I have always been taught that it was God who made the place where Moses was standing holy. Yet God seems to be saying that Moses had something to do with it also. We cannot deny what God said, “The place on which you are standing is holy ground.” Did Moses have something to do with the consecration of the ground upon which he stood? Did God want Moses, who probably spent a lot of time complaining about those damn sheep, to see the sacred space created each day by his work with sheep? Could it be that there is no such thing as unholy ground if we are standing in a place practicing God’s presence?
These were pretty simple to make - especially since I had frozen egg whites and cheated by using ground almonds, instead of toasting and grinding sliced blanched almonds. The hardest thing about these cakes was getting them in the molds. However the old trick of snipping the corner off a freezer bag to squeeze out the mixture worked a treat, so really they rightly deserve their spot on the quick and easy list.
Baked Oyster: 8.5/10 (by my better half)
Having a regular in a gay bar/macho dancer bar is oftentimes referred to by the MDs themselves as having a ‘boyfriend’ in the said bar. When and MD asks a person who has been frequenting a gay bar if he or she has a boyfriend in the said bar, the question usually means if that person regularly requests a certain MD whenever he or she goes to the said bar.
Third, which of the examples he cites are represent "more or less figurative language, or in terms which were commonly used at the time, and which in many instances are in daily use at this day, even by the most eminent men of science" as the Pope says? Not one. Bob claims in a couple of places that what Pope Leo XIII and Pius XII were really referring to were things like “atoms, forces, etc.” and “not to the general movements of the cosmos” (Response to the SSPX Press Release on Geocentrism, p. 3 and Response to David Palm on Galileo Trial, p. 4). But this won’t work at all. The popes explicitly speak of language “commonly used at the time”, i.e. in ancient times. It would be interesting to see Bob come up with even one example of any author of Scripture using the “commonly used” language of his day to describe “forces” and “atoms”.
I was living in the high-rise and after having a few girls move in and out of my place, I realized I was lonely. I only had an efficiency, but it was 700 sq. ft. or so and it was huge. I put a CraigsList ad up for a roomshare. I said you should be single and not mind sharing a room with a dude who was gone a lot. April answered. We began talking. It was decided that we should definitely not share a space as we both hated the rest of the world, equally. She accompanied me through some of my darkest times, being evicted from my tower and thrown into the duplex I spoke of earlier. The first night I met her, she brought me some Xanax and some weed. Awesome! We kept in touch with each other, exchanging about 200 emails back and forth. Come to find, she was an opiate junkie, which I was not yet. But, I had speed at the ready, and she was willing to do whatever, whenever. She had already had four or five tracheotomies, so she couldn’t breathe that well, and warned me way ahead of time, we could probably never even kiss, let alone do anything else. But, we had fun together. The night I checked myself into rehab, we did some Special K together and had a blast. We both were so fucked up, out of our minds, we couldn’t distinguish reality from fantasy. I was also the one that gave her the first taste of Fen she ever had. She, of course, couldn’t control herself and did so much, she passed out. She fell and landed on her arm, to the point of cutting off her circulation, and lay there for 6 hours. Long enough that she cut off the circulation in her arm, and she had to have her arm sliced open, a 6-in. scar she never let me forget. She made sure I understood that I really wasn’t the one that damaged her, that had happened long ago, but the guilt I felt was there, nonetheless.
where more lost air-luggage ends up than anywhere else.
there’s a roof, and a final ceiling.
-Being myself - ALWAYS AUTHENTIC.
Blog Comments:
Sorry for the confusion.
10. Story In Your Eyes
Of her true worth I only got to know
Her elder son had early childhood developmental issues, which was persistently ‘labeled’ as this-that-or-the-other. Karthi discovered that both education and medicine found it convenient and acceptable to compartmentalize her child into prescriptive and defined boxes with labels that would define him for the rest of his growing and learning life. It took an intuitive pediatrician to identify the link between his digestive system and his growth, and a change in diet worked miracles.
This past Sunday, I climbed back into my repaired Jimmy and took off for the northern section of Lawrence County. This day was memorable for this reason and also the best reason of all, my oldest son, Lynden wanted to ride along and see the countryside! To say that I had fun was a understatment! I could not help but smile as Lynden looked back and forth, just as I do, for something that caught his eyes. He would say, “Stop Dad, I see something!”
God is smilin' on you but he's frownin' too
Next, add all the individual speech averages (up to five speeches). That is the number you enter, unless it is above 24 (limit for the day). Always round up to a whole number. In the example above, the total points entered are 21 (5+5+6+5).
Jennifer Schutzius
side-falling head,
Anyway, this story is pretty well known. Christ (Jim Caviezel) prays to be delivered from what is to come, but gets dragged before the Pharisees anyway after being betrayed by Judas (Luca Lionello). He’s beaten senseless (accompanied by huge swashes of blood and bloody chunks), further tortured, and then forced to drag a cross to the point of his crucifixion. He’s nailed to the cross, put up, and then dies. Gibson decides to focus almost entirely on the suffering here, giving us a few spare moments of the resurrection. Again, it’s evident that this film is all about the bloody version of Jesus, and not the raised one.
& sometimes a girl is less (or more)
Howard put the Magic organization through hell this season with his never ending swaying back and forth on whether he was going to stay in the Magic Kingdom. It seemed like every week, he was publically dreaming about playing for another organization. I’m sure that did not endure him to his teammates or his coach. Then, when Van Gundy put him on blast, the damage was more severe than any back injury. I just hope that Howard makes up his mind and decides what he wants to do and sticks by his decision.
Not forgetting the time and energy I spend in the kitchen too!~
My husband and I are not New Year's Eve party people. We're lucky if we make it to midnight (are we boring or what??). BUT... New Year's Day we have one of my sisters and friends for dinner, including her college friend. We've had them for dinner for a few years now. So it's become a wonderful part of our holiday season. I decided to break out the Old Country roses. I usually use these dishes for accent to my Royal Albert white Val D'Or. Recently I have added to my collection and can set the table with mostly OCR. I wanted to use holiday colors still...sort of a last hurrah. And it certainly was colorful!!!
The Dirty Dozen all dayer returns to the White Lion, Congelton, on Saturday, for another day jam packed with the very best in Local Live Music, showcased over two stages. The line up includes, Fieldhouse, The Retrospective, Aaron Mobberly, The Robin Pierce Band, Cry Baby and The Hoochie Coochie Boys, Luke Gray, Cells Landing, Sweet Winn Dixie, Swim into Scarlet, Giro Junkie, Lost Scenes and more besides. There will also be Partybooth, there to photograph the event and fans, a spit roast, and more besides. Tickets are available from the venue for £10. The event starts at 12pm.
Start off by dragging your inks across the cardstock from one side to the other side - don't worry too much about being neat - it will just add to the wood grain look.
There are many ball courts in Mexico, as they were an important part of every Mayan city, and were designed much like today’s soccer pitches. Raised stone hoops, 23 feet above the ground, were placed at each end, and the Maya would play a game which was a sort of cross between soccer and basketball.
or life events and such these days.
came
There was no watch that night as everyone was too exhausted to remain awake, and so they all fell asleep.
The first four songs were dreamily meditative, tones of melancholy becoming increasingly prominent in "Wo die schönen Trompeten blasen" and "Separation." Goerne's use of text, and Andsnes' muted playing, suffused the final stanzas of the Mahler with a dreamlike awe. The influence of hymnody on "Es sungen drei Engel" was apparent in the style of Andsnes' playing, as well as the harmonies. The folktale shape of "Das irdische Leben" was belied by Goerne's dark, savage delivery, at a somewhat faster pace than I am accustomed to hearing. The last line, describing the child on the bier, was delivered not as an exclamation point, but as an expression of inconsolable disbelief that the unimaginable had happened. "Nun seh' ich wohl" was an aching threnody. Thereafter came another emotional turning point, with Andsnes' accompaniment for "Wenn dein Mütterlein" reminiscent of a Bach prelude in its clarity and purity. "Urlicht" was beautifully filled with silences, with Goerne's phrasing long, unstrained, suffused with deep longing, and deep confidence.
“The forty days of the soul begin on the morning after death. That first night, before its forty days begin, the soul lies still against sweated-on pillows and watches the living fold the hands and close the eyes, . . .The living know that, at daybreak, the soul will leave them and make its way to the places of its past . . . sometimes this journey will carry it so far for so long that it will forget to come back. For this reason, the living bring their own rituals to a standstill: to welcome the newly loosed spirit, the living will not clean, will not wash or tidy, will not remove the soul’s belongings for forty days . . .”
On Sale at Thursday September 18 at 12 Noon:
It was more than just a nice race. It was a moment of redemption. Back in the '90 when I was trying to break 4 hours I had a few DNFs. One of them was in the Jersey Shore Marathon. I overheated and puked my brains out on some of the nicest lawns in Deal NJ. It was nice to not throw up in Deal.
Although I'm not an SRO, I have given a few talks about cyber bullying to students and teachers of primary and middle schools and thought I would share some information with you should the need arise at your station to make a presentation to a class, scout/girlguide troop/ or at a PTA meeting , and some preventative measures and actions that may be taken to stop this form of on line abuse, which is now covered under some Provincial statutes and in the Criminal Code of Canada. With the use of hand held devices becoming more commonplace in schools, and class rooms across the country this is a very real issue that a lot of students and parents do not want to/ or will not address. In the most severe cases of cyber bullying and stalking some suicides have been blamed on this relatively new phenomonen in the high tech world. School bullies have been around for ages, this is just one of the new tools available to them
Upon her arrival a Black self appointed “car guard” (Sipho Baloyi), of which there are millions nowadays in SA jumped at the opportunity to make a quick 50 cents by offering to help her park.
Let’s tick off two sets of highlights. First the rarities, then the high counts. Major rarity highlights for today included, a single Black-crowned Night-Heron landing in the nearby pines, 2 Bald Eagle, 4 Merlin, 67 American Golden Plovers, 1 American Woodcock, 1 SCISSOR-TAILED FLYCATCHER, 1 Tennessee Warlber, 1 Magnolia Warbler, 1 good looking Prairie Warbler, 1 early Summer Tanager, 3 Lark Sparrows, 1 singing! Clay-colored Sparrow, and 8 Pine Siskin.
While everyone is running around cooking up their New Year's Eve plans, and gearing up for the annual countdown to the dawn of the next 365 days, I'm going to admit here that I am a little scared of 2011 creeping around the corner. New years, always mean the bringing of the new. Yeah, that's stating the obvious, I know... but tied up with the word new, are words like unknown. Or change. Or expectation. And to a creature of comfort and security like myself, those words are scary. Because change, expectation, and the unknown can also bring about disappointment. And for a dreamer who dreams and hopes so much...so very very much...that is scary - scary times three.
6. Preheat your oven to 200 degrees. The bread should look nice and puffed up now, so poke deep holes all over the surface with your index finger. Sprinkle over the 3 tbsp olive oil, salt, pepper and rosemary. Bake for 15-20 minutes or until golden brown and nicely risen.
PHILADELPHIA (AP) – Jurors in a landmark priest-abuse trial heard Monday about a priest-turned-camp prowler and another who allegedly bragged about having sex with three boys in one week….
Rapt and trapped by the concreteness – the absolute reality of this particular, real death.
On Sunday before last, I worked Preview Day at the U. Where prospective students and their parents visit the university for a tour and one huge meet-n-greet with departments, student organizations, etc.
Your natural inclination is to think of Rivers Cuomo (Weezer), but that's only because of the glasses and slight resemblance in the facial features. I'll simply point out that there were basically no designer glasses back then and no one wore contact lenses. Thus, looking past the nerdy frames, this guy was probably a fairly popular fellow.
2m L x 4m W x 3.8m H
But think about the coat rack. It's a functional way to hang many coats, hats, bags and takes up very little space. And they call to mind so many other lovely items: trees, chandeliers, a vase of branches...
- Gnocchi in sundried tomato cream
Anna Chan is one of those simply kind, thoughtful people who goes out of her way to help other people.
For most of that journey if not all, the skies weren’t much unlike those of London at the time. It was quite grey but not too chilly. I understood they had a few museums there as well; The Cannabis Museum, The Sex Museum and the Van Gogh Museum…none of which I actually managed to visit. Hahaha, higghhh guuuuy.
11th Symposium on Biomaterials Science – “Bioactive Scaffolds – from the Nano to the Macro Scale”
If you've made it this far, pour yourself a glass of sweet sloe nectar and listen to the poem in Gaelic.
Purple, blue and gray, Oh my!
Simon coughs clearly trying not to laugh, Ethan rolls his eyes and Jamie continues to glare. I shrug disinterestedly.
Boots step 1
~~the vagaries of Dyeing Without a Net: I learned to do it The Right Way, timing and measuring and following instructions, and now I ignore all of that and experiment.
but lately, we've been having second thoughts. i started realizing that because of the way our house is designed, the siding & brick split the house in half, & the yellow side risks being a bit stark while the brick side risks looking bland. everyone asks us if the left side is an addition, but it's not. it's original to the house & to the plans. who knows why they did siding for the den & garage part?!
That said, there are a lot of people who are being kept out of relationship at this time so as to sidestep the harshest of the tail-end Piscean era relationship detritus.
The image is LOTV coloured with copics
Corporal,City Council
“Why don’t we follow each subject as she goes about her daily life? That way our readers get to come along with us and get a behind- the-scenes look at what happens to them. Instead of just a boring interview, we—and our readers—get to hang around with these women, see them in their natural habitat, and even see how other people treat them.”
No application of Sunblock – Not doing a little routine like lathering on sun block on your face and neck will give you a lot of problems. One of which is skin cancer. The harmful rays of the sun will destroy your skin, especially if you are exposed to it for a very long time. Always apply sunscreen before leaving the house or exposing yourself to sunlight.
My mother and sisters took a long time to warm up to N (my mother never did). This only strengthened my resolve and hers to make this work no matter what.
And this is why ‘diversion’ is not the word we need: it is perfectly possible, in fact often it is desirable, that someone is within both the Mental Health and Criminal Justice systems and whilst the first destination may be prison, it may that we could not possibly know this when we set off. But set off, we must. Mental health care can be provided in prisons by ‘inreach’ teams before identifying a need to move to hospital, but still subject to criminal justice frameworks within the Mental Health Act (ie, a restricted transfer direction under s47/49 MHA). It may then be that the person is remitted back to prison, once treatment for mental disorder has been effective enough to ensure that the patient no longer needs inpatient mental health care, but may again receive ‘inreach’ mental health care from the NHS.
Current book (1/2 done): Such Friends Are Dangerous by Walter Tyrer
But that is not the same as believing in God.
British negotiate an agreement with Portugal calling for gradual abolition of slave trade in the South Atlantic.
Let us live our evenings to the fullest so we might be allowed to imagine that we are what you are—creatures of flesh and blood and rainbows. Give an answer for a mother to say when her child asks her, “Mother, where are we from?” We are the prisoners of yesterday. We make collages out of the Yellow Pages. We like to be pawns since we are not allowed to die just like our fathers who fought, died, and went forgotten in a truck, a grave, or a sandstorm.
Therefore, since he was young, he really liked mickey mouse shirt,(since then it was micky)
facebook.com/christopher.husary
9. Gotten in a car with people you just met? - Do cabbies count?
“Did you know that each flake is different?” she asked him. “God must be pretty amazing to have thought that one up, don’t you think.”
I love that I´m here.
- You get mad at your mom if she laughs or thinks anything is funny, (including the massive concern over the diameter of sperm.)
Why do you look like such a three year old? When did this happen? How did you become big enough to put your own toothpaste on the brush? I can't wait to party with you this Summer, Bubsie. I think we'll have even more fun than last year.
Bake until tops are light golden and wooden skewer inserted in center comes out clean, 20 to 25 minutes. Cool cakes on wire rack 8 to 10 minutes. Run thin metal spatula around pan perimeter to loosen. Invert cake onto parchment-lined wire rack, peel off parchment, and reinvert cake onto parchment paper-lined rack.** Cool completely before frosting. Adapted from The Best Recipe, by Cook's Illustrated.
The donkie: Krugersdorp Afrikaner squatter camp has split into two factions: one faction refuses the other faction access to the only electricity-access point so the Christian faction made its own hot water boiler, runs a communal open-air kitchen and repaired some scrounged electricy-generators.
Sodium? What sodium?
This photo was taken outside our house last winter. We had so much snow it was unbelievable. The snow we've got this winter has melted away in hours, but it's snowing today again and it looks like it will stay this time. Sigh...
Whatever your oasis is
10/24 Denver, CO @ Bender's
The new Archbishop of Rwanda, the Most Rev. Onesphore Rwaje, has vowed to carry on the policies of his predecessor, Archbishop Emmanuel Kolini, and push for the reform of the Anglican Communion.
The rule of thumb…one of the few suggestions from successful self-pubbed writers that actually seems to work…is to not waste much time on marketing your latest release. Instead, use that time for writing your next book. I have done that with The Hollows and the sales for the book show the lack of attention I have been giving it.
- much better low light (high ISO) performance
I, for one, can no longer sit idly by, watching abuse heaped upon these poor stepchildren of the confectionary world. So I'm doing something about it.
YOU GOTTA LOVE GARFIELD’S EXPLANATION — TOO CUTE & ALSO TOO TRUE!!!
It’s one of those days. I want to put the kids in their room and close the door and leave them there. Is that terrible? They are driving me nuts, they have been fighting and whining all morning. No matter what I do, it doesn’t change. I’ve just decided that they’re both in bad moods. They’re actually screaming as I type this!
I turned to scan the room as the line looked infinitely long. That's when I spotted him sitting on the bench just behind the line, studying.
November ’09 A second WRC planning meeting, attended by 11 GSA employees, was held at the M Resort following Region 9’s leadership council meeting.
I tend to like the layered look. I absolutely love pretty books and buy some here and there when I get a chance. I'd love to have more. You can also tell, I have a thing for white ceramics - jars, vases, birds. I find they look nice grouped together, plus are very versatile in that you can use them anywhere in your home if you feel like moving things around.
the weather was hot and i was super comfortable in my striped skirt and a tank top.
Steve Wagenlander: How do you evaluate branded edition data?
That's it. These goals WILL take time, committment, energy, motivation. But they are goals I can work towards and don't have to be done right now. So what if I don't work out twice a week? As long as I at least make an effort to meet that goal, then I'm doing alright. It's a process. I think too many people get so worried that they're going to fail their New Year's goals that they give up before they really get started. By setting goals, you're giving yourself something to work towards. I really believe it's all in the way you think about it. Give yourself some wiggle room!
IN AN ACT OF MUTUALITY THE GOODLY PLANETS MERCURY AND VENUS
At 800 words so far, this blog post is twice as long as the experts agree it should be to keep readers. They also consistently admonish bloggers to write about our own expertise. I haven’t known how to begin with that. I am the quintessential jack of all trades, a master of none. That is of course with one exception; my life. I am an expert, not because I always get it right, rather because I pay attention and describe it from my perspective. And that’s the one that really and ultimately counts.
“I can’t remember ever feeling like that again Roger. You have been so wrapped up in your work that you have hardly noticed me, noticed my despair. I longed for you to look up from your blueprints, your plans and schemes, and just see this woman, this flesh and blood, sitting before you, just hoping for a smile, a simple glance that would prove that you still feel the same way about me. But it never came Roger, it never came.”
RVTIB Blog (rvtibblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
Baby, you don't need 'em
Or “I’m just too busy right now” or “I don’t have the answers yet.”
If you know who walks beside you, you will never fear.
Hal wasn't in danger from Tom – in fact he lured Tom into the van after Alex got everyone else out of the building.
Journaling:
Downloadable Games
“Threats” by Amelia Gray
Top left: Richard III (from a larger piece of British monarchs which one day I will get to...)
Francesco Dellamorte (Rupert Everett) is the caretaker of the cemetery in the small Italian town of Buffalora which is cursed with the dead coming back to life within seven days of their death. Francesco and his almost mute assistant Gnaghi (François Hadji-Lazaro) take care of this problem by efficiently killing the returners a second time with a head-shot either from Francesco’s handgun or Gnaghi’s spade. Francesco is tall, handsome and depressed and likes the rain while Gnaghi is short round and fairly cheerful and likes the sunshine.
This is a spoiler review of "Oregon", episode five of Awake, a TV series about a police detective, Michael Britten, who loses a family member in a car crash. Britten responds by creating a dream world in which a different family member died in the crash, a dream world so real that he can't tell it from the real world, and is in fact determined to act as though both worlds are real. As I've noted before, while in reality (the Green World) Detective Britten's wife Hannah died in the crash, Britten has created a dream world (the Red World) where Hannah survived and it was his son Rex who died in the crash.
Looking back on my first postings for this website is interesting. I was fascinated with Peeps, perplexed by the amazing durability of their appeal for nearly 60 years. After hunting for Peeps, not realizing that they were readily available at every Duane Reade, I found them at Dylan's Candy Bar on the Upper East Side and did a story, Peeps, on April 16, 2006.
Wow! We had such a fun time on our honemoon cruise in Europe. So beautiful! Well, I guess you want to hold it with this boring chatter and get on with the pictures. I don't blame you......so here it goes.
Hi all....
Yes, the girl is bad news. She finds roommates, steals their money, then acts so awful that they move out. She has no qualms about getting an 11-year-old boy drunk or selling illegal Chinese energy pills on the black market. She’ll screw your fiance on your birthday cake to prove a point (which she actually does in the first 2min of the pilot). Oh and she’s best friends with James Van Der Beek. But despite of all this… Chloe is kind of lovable… or at the very least like-able enough to keep tuning in every week to see what next atrocious thing she’ll do. She’s a girl that takes no sass in a city that will eat you alive, and I kind of find myself rooting for her to find that nice person we all know she can be… I mean come on Chloe, WHO HURT YOU????But you gotta hand it to her, she might be mean and her methods without remorse, but she doesn’t take crap from people and that is somewhat admirable. Plus, I think that deep, deep, DEEP down she has a heart, and that comes out slowly but surely with the people she has in her inner circle, and she is fiercely protective of those she loves. Yes, she might have slept with her roommate’s fiancee within the first week of her moving in, but it was just to prove that he was a cheater! I mean that’s kind of sweet, right? Okay, no, maybe that’s just messed up, but for Chloe, I think that’s a step in the right direction into the world of puppies, rainbows, unicorns, and kittens… or at the very least a step into being a real person and not sociopathy personified… baby steps people, baby steps. Oh and did I mention that she is absolutely hilarious?
10. Our Anniversary: I saved the best for last. Ryan and I will celebrate our third wedding anniversary at the end of May. It’s been such a fun ride so far, and I can’t wait to see what other adventures life has planned for us next.
My kids like to collect small household objects and see which ones stick to the magnets. You could chart them in two columns.
RENOVATION
It is also understood that, living so remotely, we all depend on each other for support and safety and it is remarkable how much that understanding transcends orientations of any kind. These are folk who continue to labor hard for a living and know that, in times of crisis, abandonment of each other is not an option. A great deal of bartering occurs here quite naturally, often over the hood of a pick up truck while passing by on a walk. I find this kind of tolerant give and take, and individual respect, to be a testament to the plain, simple honor of human integrity and, though such folk are not my native people, I find it easy to socialize, and fit in, with them than I had ever imagined. And depend upon them. As they know they can do with me. I know that, when the going gets tough, we are all going to show up at whatever shows up in our collective backyard. And, somehow, figure out, together, the right thing to do. That’s no small change in the universe, in my opinion.
the MITM was doing his best to stay calm. but dealing with my unknowns and the whimsanddramaqueenspoiledoldladyantics of miss daisy, his dance card has been overflowing and he's been even more stressed than normal! and let's don't even talk about his day job! anyway, he is a most wonderful man and i am most fortunate to have him as friend, companion, lover and husband! and...
Can you believe the King of Spain went elephant hunting in Africa?
Where can you find a table which ranks the USA third behind Brazil and India? Where is the largest community of Lithuanians outside Lithuania? In what country did 310,000 Poles register in the five years to May this year, twenty five times the number of the previous five years?
Every single morning,
2. Birthdays: My younger brother and my best friend both share a birthday on Cinco De Mayo. For my brother’s birthday, we’re going to see The Avengers which I’m super excited about. (Not that his birthday isn’t enough cause to get excited, but what can I say? I love movies!) My birthday is also in May, so my best friend, Holly, and I usually have our own girly celebration in between both our birthdays. Not sure what mischief we’ll get into this year, but it’s always a fun time. Other birthdays in May, my mother-in-law, future sister-in-law, and nephew. Par-tay!
A short tale, where a boy trapped in an attic is spooked out by a legion of sullen, soulless dolls. Creepy at first, but it feels like it lets a little too much light in at the end.
I finished it off by making a small hole and putting a lolly stick through it for a bird to stand on, I did use my little £ shop chicks at first but then I remembered I had got these little birds (Caramelos on etsy)
As a life long Chicago Cubs baseball fan, I must also give thanks to Budweiser for supporting the late, great baseball announcer Harry Caray, one of our country's national treasures, who announced the Cub games in the 80's and 90's during the time I grew up near Chicago. Harry Caray was from a by-gone era of unapologetic home field announcers who connected emotionally with Cub fans with his passion, elation and frustration over the course of each season. Today's announcers are far more distant and analytical by comparison. You could tell whether that Cubs were winning or losing just by listening to Harry's tone of voice for only five seconds. Considering how well he resonated with Chicago sports fans, he must have been an obvious choice for Anheuser-Busch to hire as a pitchman for Budweiser, and his smiling face could be seen all on billboards all over Chicago and on local TV commercials hawking Budweiser. Somehow, the constant presence of Harry Caray warmly exhorting us to enjoy a cold Budweiser had a comforting effect few grew tired of.
Prima stencils
What did I do all day?? I worked on the final parts of my Professional Growth Plan or PGP. I have my final meeting next week when we come back from Spring Break. So my focus this year was on higher level questioning. I started at the beginning of the year writing questions here and there for all subject areas. I wasn't too happy with the results so I started only writing questions for reading. My goal was to get a whole set complete by the end of the year. Well ta-da...I did it! I have 5 questions for each lesson of ImagineIt, yep all 6 Units! If you are an ImagineIT teacher please feel free to pick up the document and use it for youself...
Start was at 7 a.m. on Saturday. Great weather, sunshine and warmth. The first 32 km until Frevgias were a nice warm up for what would follow. I enjoyed the fantastic Swiss countryside. We ran through tunnels, along mountains and next to wild creeks. Relaxing.
and I see the people around me
Auckland's pride rests on the grave
Speaking of making my own, I totally feel the craft itch right now, and I have a 25% off coupon at Michaels that is calling my name! But in the spirit of being totally transparent - I should go running, I should pre-chop all my fruits and veggies for the upcoming week, and I really should work on organizing my upstairs office..... I'll probably go to Michaels and buy something to put on my front door!
Hal Lindes : guitars
Thoughts: On the one hand, it's a good thing, in the view of this libertarian, to see a liquor board aware of the issues that confront an evolving business environment, and adjust accordingly. On the other hand, why does it take a freaking act of the state legislature for the Maryland Zoo in Baltimore to tweak its liquor license? (Heck, aside from the annual Brew at the Zoo--which, by the way, is May 26-27 this year--were you even aware that the Maryland Zoo had to have its own liquor license?!?!?)
These are my first two bites of an Oreo. I'm not a bisuit connoisseur, they taste a bit like a Bourbon. On looks and smell Benny gave them the paws-up.
and attach a snatch-strap to a large limb
The guest speaker.
To vote for a blind, brain-damaged chimpanzee covered in its own feces than any of the Republican "candidates" currently campaigning to be our country's next president.
But the government and the police have not the intelligence or insight to think about how these rape campaigns are radicalising our community.
The “What Can We Do?” thread at Gates of Vienna is one of the most comprehensive anti-jihad discussion held, both in terms of what has been discussed and in terms of the broad range of people who's been involved. It's been a virtual anti-jihad mini-conference.
Lynn asks Marika to take on a mission to board a liner and ‘kidnap’ Jenny Dolittle, who is being forced into an arranged marriage by her uncle so he can make his son the heir to the massive Hugh-Dolittle company. Marika agrees, but Jenny arrives aboard a state-of-the-art spacecraft before they get started. Lynn and Jenny reveal they’re in a relationship, and Jenny requests asylum, which Marika grants. Jenny’s uncle tries to pressure Harold Lloyd to make Marika give her up, but Marika is able to negotiate a deal with Show that will work out for everyone, which he agrees to. Not long afterward, the Hugh Dolittle fleet opens fire on the Bentenmaru, which jumps away in retreat.
The 2nd photoshoot yesterday was of a 3.5 year old boy. His specialty was that he had a slight form of autism, which made this shoot one of the more interesting shoots, as it is both more challenging, but mostly as well more rewarding to take pictures, as those kids have some very cool impressions.
Our tiny new apartment was a mere fraction of the size of our former home, and yet it felt like a kingdom to us. The Victorian ceilings were high enough to hold all of our expectations. The old uneven hardwoods supported our dancing feet and the old furniture we dragged in off the street. We explored our new neighborhood like wide-eyed children. We absorbed everything. Everyone. In two months time, I went from never having ridden a city bus to navigating from one neighborhood to the next without even looking up.
Sensible shopping
Guess what?? I am going to share something with you tomorrow that I am in love with from teh Winter CHA releases :) There just might be a giveaway involved :)
Toner also dismissed a suggestion that it was racial profiling. “I think we all know that that’s clearly not the case. The fact of the matter is tens of thousands of Muslims travel to and from the United States every day and are not detained or delayed.”
Platoon (dir. by Oliver Stone, 1986)
As I’ve hiked around Acadia, I have found many trees with these “bulbous” growths coming out of them. This is not at all common in (no pun intended), the “neck of the woods” from which I hail (Pennsylvania), but seems to be a very common occurence here.
so I pull Squirrel out of bed to make sure I'm not hallucinating or suffering brain hemorrhage then I make her run with me to the shops to buy a shortcrust pastry block then we whistle that soft block back home double-quick where I stuff it with feta cheese and tomatoes and
Oh and when you attempt humour, we don’t want robots with ridiculously poor accents yeah?
I had zero intention of redoing the master bedroom when we moved in. I loved our master bedroom in our last house, and figured I would simply move everything from that bedroom into this bedroom. Except when we got here, it didn't quite look right. The old bedroom was filled with light at all hours of the day. The new bedroom is much darker. The old bedroom was tiny (10 x 10), with lots of gorgeous molding around the windows and ceiling, and with hardwood floors. The new bedroom is much larger, builder-grade, has weirdly accented corner walls, very high ceilings and is fully carpeted.
This a lovely wool applique done in awesome soft wools. all she did was enlarge the drawing for the pattern. Love it Karen !! Remember peoples, send me photos of your creations using my designs , in any form...I love'em all !!!
- Naturally I would hit on someone. "Mark Fabulous" the assistant surgeon. I never actually met him, but showed a great interest in him
Heard a discussion of credit derivatives on PBS last night by their business "expert," Paul Solman, and was disappointed that he totally ignored what I consider to be the WORST thing about derivatives.
his first friend.
I was in traffic court the other day. Something usually good and humorous happens. Today was no exception. I see an old police academy buddy of mine who I haven't seen in a few years. He's there for a "client" who decided to fight the ticket for a stop sign.
It had been awhile since I had shopped for the mister. I had recently gone on a rampage of buying him good work shirts – but he had no good casual clothes – the kind of clothing that makes you think a man can fix your stove but also smells good while doing it. Something like…..this:
No & No....This is NOT the card in my header...AND this is NOT from my husband (I had to divest myself of him quite awhile back...LOL)....This card is for one of my sons to give to his wife "Deborah". He saw the card in my header and really like it and asked me to make another, but to create it as an easel card.
I look at my own work and I can say that I am proud of how I have written my posts, how I have presented myself to the hobby and how I treat my fellow hobbyists/bloggers. I try to be as honest as I can.
“There is no compulsion in Islam. Certainly, right has become clearly distinct from wrong.”
While the onesie is selected with the bounding box around it, you want to copy and paste another onesie on to the mat.
"But a story is just that. It isn't the truth."
We are all prisoners to some degree of the mindsets we develop in our early adulthood and professional training. Some medical historians consider that, until antibiotics came along, medical interventions were likely to do as much harm as good to the patient. In the 1930s a belief in homeopathy, which, when all its bogus scientific claims are stripped away, is simply the administration of a placebo, was as good a faith as any for my mother to adopt. There is nothing wrong with placebos, especially when the placebo effect flows from the care and attention of a sympathetic homeopathic practitioner as well as from a credulous patient hungry for a remedy to their illness. So we shouldn't pass too harsh a judgment on past medical practices seen through the lens of today. No doubt, in fifty years time, the currently mainstream treatment I have received for my bronchiectasis will appear hopelessly outdated and misguided.
They should go to their own church and serve well in the position that they’re in. I wouldn’t say anything to them about Passion City Church. If they say, “I know about Passion; I’ve been to some of the events and I’ve been waiting for something like this to come along,” then great. How other people find their way to Passion City Church is really about the Holy Spirit.
Too has a needed “loo-bloo” epiphany -
Elena Deogracias (Nora Aunor) is a second wife of a politician. While running for governor of their province, her husband, Armando Deogracias (Bembol Roco) was assassinated by a grenade explosion. This leads for the Party to replace Amang. They decided for Elena to be his substitute and won as governor of their province.
I mean, you really have to live and breathe these things. In the big scheme of things, movies are the only escape some of us have and when you watch them, they take you to a place that you could never reach on your own.
So after four days you can imagine the friction that was in the air after I spotted Jack. I didn't know how long he had been watching me. My insides were all mushy feeling and little nervous zingy feelings kept shooting through my body. I made it clear though by ignoring him that I wasn't backing down and Jack decided he didn't care if he lost that battle.
If you then took all the kids who’d excelled on the first test, and gave them a similar quiz on applied neurosurgery, they’d all generally do no better than chance. You might find one or two getting high scores in this one as well, depending on the size of your class, but even though they all scored highly to begin with, the averages in the second test will be, well, average. It’d be exactly the same if you took the lowest scorers from the first test.
The extent to which it is about Buffett is that it demonstrates how his careful selection of CEO – based almost entirely on character, rather than credentials, resumes or recommendations – and then his ability to leave them alone to run their businesses makes him “”the best boss in the world”. Of course, he doesn’t abandon them: he is available any time for a phone conversation and many of them take the opportunity, because they learn from him whenever they do.
If you’re ever in the Welsh marches, anywhere near Presteigne, I’d put this place in the must visit category. Light, bright, beautiful and very tasty cakes! The perfect place for a birthday morning tea.
and hid them in a jar made of tender earth’s smiles .
We are so happy to announce the return of our Crystal Occasions Ultimate Wedding Giveaway!!!! We are doing things a little differently this year but we are looking forward to an even bigger and better contest.
You may have noticed that Mr Thomas has two default templates for his news articles. In the first – such as the baby tyrannosaur news item I covered at the end of this post, or the Io post – he takes a legitimate news piece and/or scientific study, and uses that as a launch pad to talk about something only vaguely related, usually something he claims ‘evolutionists’ cannot yet explain. Alternatively, in a post like this, he takes the study and reinterprets it to back up creationist ideas.
or heart on which to lean.
Whether this shit works or not is wholly irrelevant - I am back.
Another way to boost Nutella flavor, while cutting into the density of the cake, would be to scoop out a bit of the middle and fill with Nutella. Or double the amount of frosting that I made. Whatever your poison. Or cupcake pan size.
Saturday: Freebie- We usually eat out on Saturdays
And, they rule "their" civilization.
In Scotland, concerns have been expressed by charities and campaign groups over a similar stunt using the highly alcoholic cinnamon-flavoured schnapps Aftershock instead of vodka.
Broccoli - I've tried broccoli in the Fall and one year it did really well, the next year, not so much. This year I'm going try it as a Spring crop and see what happens.
15ml Lemon juice
Add the broth/wine mixture in half-cup increments, stirring constantly so the rice doesn't stick. After two additions of broth, add half the sunchoke mixture and stir well to combine. Add another two additions of broth, add the remaining sunchokes. Incorporate another cup of broth and taste; you want the rice to be al dente and may not need the additional broth.
Back in Dublin I just about had enough time to repack the suitcase before my journey to South Africa began. Nearly 24 hours of travelling finally had me in Grahamstown in the Eastern Cape. The first day was rain, rain and rain. This had lasted a few days already, but it stopped quickly and sun and "summer" weather was back. Strange to think this was winter for them!
and king of the dirty sheets. I sit in the middle
Cartridges - Stand & Salute, Hannah Montana Font (A and H), Plantin School Book
Let’s Talk is a campaign fronted most visibly by Olympic Champion Clara Hughes and backed by Bell Canada to create a national conversation about mental health and to reduce or eliminate the stigma that attaches to mental illness.
Do you have special connections to a book? I know that I have a ton of special books, but Where the Wild Things Are definitely holds a very special place in my heart.
Then creep through grass and pop down
I'll have to label this a habit of mine: I build up to a big climax, which may take a while to convulse its way out, and then bang! Done! Drop the curtain!
(4) It furnishes moisture for yeast plants.
Sessions responded:
Senior Counsel Stanley Marcus is urging Health Minister Fuad Khan to hush… but Fuad, is days now I telling you hush. Is days now I telling you that you can’t be discussing Cheryl Miller business in such a casual and cavalier manner…so much years you is a doctor, you never learn bout doctor/client confidentiality? Quit the Cheryl Miller Smear Campaign….it done looking bad that your ministry involved in this debacle…do the right thing!
Think of yourself... you are a world - as is your family and your home. And there is our world - a whole - a mass of energetically integrated organisms and life-forms. I wonder how many see it that way though?
I never did text him. I don’t want to be overbearing. He knows tomorrow is my birthday so I’m curious to see if he texts me. But I’ll text him regardless just to check and see how his dad is doing.
Actually, maybe they are right. After all, the entire American Public Education System is about as socialistic as you can possibly get.
But the message wouldn't be brilliant. It would just be adequate. Still, Rachel felt she should write it anyway. Even though it wouldn't earn her his love, or bring her any gains, it was just a nice to thing to do. Tell someone you appreciate them.
of contact
Eight Men Out (John Sayles)
I apologize for todays rant, I have a serious case of the jitters and don't even know which way to look at this point!
Free to do as he wished, Carkner signed with Florida where he played the final four years of his career, helping the miracle Panthers reach the 1996 Stanley Cup finals before losing to Colorado.
So...now I sit back and wait and make plans for a trip without them, just in case.
“We should do this more often,” said Diane.
Margaret, a media planning specialist herself, has been more than 25 years in the industry. She represents the advertisers’ association on the ABC Board, though she is head of media and property at Tune group (which includes Air Asia).
Various bits for Ork, Eldar and Space Marine armies and more besides..
IV. It was 105 feet high (LXX cubitorum altitudinis)
Finally, I have decided to pay attention to signs all around me. I have always done so, but I have become infinitely more sensitive to what the universe is trying to tell me, whether I will be ridiculed for this or not. The other day when I was driving from work, consumed by anxious thoughts, I looked out to see an incredible rainbow. I found consolation in its glorious beauty as the arch put my mind to ease.
Also, the plot bothered me. It's as if the plot would work if all three were read in one sitting: the first book was like the foundation of the story--the introduction and rising action, but a long way from the climax. While I'm now bouncing to read the sequel, I'm afraid that I'll have already forgotten what happened by the time it gets around to the US because Ruby Red didn't have a plot of its own.
NOTE: these online sellers have frequent sales and discounts available to their mailing lists, so you might want to add your name to them.
We are letting the kids dribble in slowly..week by week. This week we started with our Elementary Aged crew. One incredibly enthusiastic and energetic 6 year old boy along with his more timid, but imaginative 11 year old sister. And, of course, Bug.
They are at the age where they are changing and looking so grown up. All the sudden we can start to see what they will look like when they are teenagers.
So have a listen and have some revolution in your life. Happy May Day.
Please. I think I might actually prefer the chloroform.
Museu do Futebol
What is required is a BASIC INCOME GRANT for all those without employment. A Basic Income Grant that would ensure all being within a certain income bracket receives the Grant to ensure a dignified quality of living. This will also stop “Economic Slavery” as now one will not be forced to work a job they don’t want to, simply because they have no money and must take that particular job. With a Basic Income Grant this will immediately stop homelessness. As ALL citizens would be entitled to a Basic Income Grant.
Lee’s coaching knowledge and philosophy is also influenced from his brothers as a child. Lee said he copied how his brothers dressed, wore their hats, and a lot of their actions on the field. He said he learned a lot by playing summer pickup games with his middle brother, Terry, during summers.
Oddly enough this wasn't an isolated incident. The next night I saw three cyclists around the Perth Road. Number one was dressed in all black, no lights and no helmet but this guy never left the pavement. A nice surprise for any unsuspecting pedestrian. The second may have been the same person as the cyclist mentioned in the first story. They looked about as stupid anyway. The last guy I saw that night was wearing a florescent coat and had a light at the front. Now that's how it's done.
It sounded like someone was trying to open the front door, but Riley just figured it was the dog
The 26.2 mile journey had officially begun.
DETROIT – Students from a Detroit school and the University of Michigan are setting up six outdoor libraries in the city following recent library branch closings.
Here's the veggie seeds....
As for knitting, the Japanese shirt has regressed somewhat. I had put in the second buttonhole last time, and there was a mysterious indentation in the selvedge at that point. There isn’t going to be any other edging in which it could be fudged, so I decided to rip. (“When in doubt, take it out.") The buttonhole has been replaced, the edge is straight, but I haven’t knit back quite to the previous point.
Step Three: Tease the hair that you sectioned off (your bangs or the hair in the front of your head) until its volume is to your liking.
Where do you live? Holloman Afb, New Mexico
13. Who I Am! (LP Ver.) (6:34)
We find a spare blueberry in the fridge at my parent’s house, so symmetry is restored to the decoration, even if the icing sugar covering is a bit sparse.
Are You a Healthy Caregiver?
What makes him one is the weeklong blizzard that strands him and six other kids at their high school. Frankly, he could be the love child of Jack Bauer and La Femme Nikita and still be an underdog in that situation. All sorts of obstacles conspire to stack the odds and make characters sympathetic in YA, whether it’s being the new kid in town or subject to the machinations of a hellish dystopian society.
Last weekend, he specially requested that I attend a ‘festival’ at Bicentennial park with the family. The details surrounding this ‘festival’ remained ambiguous. Secretly, I was hoping it involved some sort of wine and cheese. No, I couldn’t have been more wrong.
BODY OF PROOF does well enough overseas that ABC might stay with this Dana Delaney procedural. That show always kills me. They do autopsies in room with glass windows. And people just walk by, ho hum.
What to do? We're having difficulty coming to consensus on the apartment hunt and I'm getting worn out from hunting them all down. There's no deadline because we're in a month-to-month rent right now, so we can take essentially as much or as little time as we want or need. That becomes problematic when it gives you the sense that there's always the possibility of something better out there!
6. Roy Ayers - Rock Your Roll
Steve’s been writing from an early age, his first completed story was done in an English lesson. Unfortunately, after the teacher read it, he had to have a chat with the head of the year about the violent content and bad language. The follow up ‘One boy and his frog’ was less concerning to his teachers and got him an A.
“If you don’t go and get me some cheese, I’m gonna rip your head off and give you a spinedectomy…”
Banana Walnut Muffins
Yes children are our future but at this rate do we have one. Children are mistreated , abused, sold down the river in every single country under the sun. The poems I have written have all been stories but are all based on facts I researched , true.The things that are done to children, some beaten black and blue. Married off at eight or nine or sold in to slavery too, girls cut and sewn up simply to please a man, young boys dressed as girls and taught to dance bought and owned by “Pious” men and used for sex after they have watched them prance.
Remember to call on Me
Report Facts, Do Not Withhold Facts Please - Or simply get out of the Journalism business.Name the bar, report eyewitness accounts, and do not be afraid to give a profile of the alleged perp.
It is clear that, in our Union, lay democracy is failing when it comes to the conduct of industrial disputes - and that it is doing so because too many of those elected to be accountable to our members are content to be mere spectators as the "world class negotiators" do their thing.
I became someone I didn’t know I was capable of being- someone who lied, someone who cheated, someone who skipped out on responsibilities, someone who acted on impulse with no regard to others, someone who lashed out in irrational ways, someone who was miserable. In reality, I was someone who was feeling very small and very scared and entirely alone.
But I guess these are the questions:
We went a lot of places, and Mom and the other lady did some goofy things like kneeling down in the mud and pointing those things on straps at plants. Plants! Who cares about them? I walked on some to point out how stupid that was, but I got yelled at.
I truly enjoy both. I love to travel though, I would love a job that I could travel the world and see every city but since I can’t, I love it when a book take me away even if it’s for a couple hours. But being able to imagine that I am on the beach of an exotic location or on the cold rain cobblestoned streets of some old European city is just as exciting as having the stamps put into my own passport.
Wynkoop Brewing Company Mister Fister
I fear -- how long had I to wait! --
There were no reports of earthquakes at the time.
What TIME is it? TIME to pause and give TIME some TIME, before TIME decides to stop working on your behalf. TIME out for ignoring TIME, it deserves your respect. So join me as I give TIME it’s props for always showing up for me and making TIME even when I do not make TIME!
One Saturday in the month of August, you leave your home wearing your tennis gear, accompanied by your wife. In the middle of the garden you point out to her that you've forgotten your racket in the house. You go back to look for it, but instead of making your way toward the cupboard in the entryway where you normally keep it, you head down into the basement. Eduoard Levé's Suicide begins with a description of the subject's act, unforgettable for its nonchalance, and continues with evidence of what may or may not be its calculation: the subject's taste for the unknown, for taking the elevator up but never down, for dead authors still in print, for reading a dictionary like a novel, for collecting unusual names.
Bunnings Noosaville
Well, 8759 now.
Sean: "What kind?"
I:Cube - Falling
Soon my little minions (that's YOU) come into play. I need your help marketing and selling and buying. You don't have to buy anything processed or sold, or sell anything processed or bought, or process anything sold...bought... Sorry, Lloyd Dobler occasionally takes up residence in my noggin. He's gone now. Back to the topic at hand.
But in order to avoid a possible disruption or interruption in a normal operation of the Government, it is decreed, by the majority, of course, that this judgment take effect upon the expiration of fifteen days from the date of its entry. No costs to be charged.
Victorian bride
Gas prices he doth not compare.
7) Your Bank Address;
Black Dress looks at Designers of African heritage as well as those wth an "African" Aesthetic and even those who do "Black Dress" as in Formal Wear. then there is Black dress as in teh color Black (as someone reminded me) Designers can click to This LINK to submit or enter info ...
Meanwhile, my family life, other than my husband, has taken an odd turn. My parents finally bought a house here. My husband and I were overjoyed that they would no longer be staying with us every other weekend when they came to town. But then my good-for-nothing manipulative older brother lost his job and my dad told him to come live in their house rent free. After living there a couple weeks, he then told my parents the house (a two bedroom, one bath) was too small for them to stay there too. So my parents are staying with us again. What can I do, though? I can't be a bitch and say no, can I? It's annoying and frustrating that I can see what he's doing, but for some reason my dad in particular is blind to it.
On which cushion would you place your bet? :)
I did a bit of google hunting and discovered The (Trans) Mangina Monologues, a celebration of Trans male sexuality and e-mailed them for monologue help. Adorably enough, a feller named Serge from the group replied to me immediately and even sent me some sample monologues from their book There Is No Word For It that will be coming out "Autumn 2010". These monologues are amazing and I'm very appreciative of how genuinely receptive they were to helping me out and sharing/responding so swiftly. I'm excited to meet with my MTF friend and put out transtastic combination monologue together. Then there's, ya know, the whole on-stage bit. But some times, bullets must be bit.
Wow, what a special year 2010 has been, not so much because of what I did but rather because of many things I did not expect. Here are my top 10 surprises in no particular order:
As you can see, I changed her head substantially and some other body parts. She came out to be exactly 13” tall using Vanna’s Choice acrylic Size 4 medium worsted yarn. Hooks E and G.
Oh, how I love New Year’s resolutions. Something about the blank slate, the possibility for growth.
In any case, it turns out that the show is a great success, and one of the most powerful moments of the book for me is when Ms. Angelou describes how the members of the cast had decided not to bow or smile at the finale, but instead to stand there and accept their well-deserved applause. I found this supremely fitting. And yet, the scene back-stage baffled me. A member of the audience, whom Angelou describes as "A young white woman of about thirty, expensively dressed and well cared for" (how on earth she could know whether this woman was well cared for or not is beyond me - it is not unimaginable that perhaps this woman had overcome a life of poverty to take good care of herself - certainly Maya's own personal elegance in appearance does not belie the adversity she has seen) and when the woman tells Maya that she is a fan of the show, having come to see it with her friends five times, Maya questions the woman "How many blacks live in your building?" "How many black friends do you have?" (p. 185). Yes, the woman's behaviour at the closing of this conversation is reprehensible, calling Maya "you people", but did not Maya herself judge this woman from the outset, based solely on her appearance? I was further confused by this scene when on p. 238 Angelou writes:
Hilary: Or, He set forth the Prophets as it were winepresses, into which an abundant measure of the Holy Spirit, as of new wine, might flow in a teeming stream.
I almost didn’t write today since I did not go to the coffee shop since that is where the literary magic takes place.
So yeah, now that my ‘Who got the most value’ article is done, I fully expect Bruce Irvin to emerge as the next Dwight Freeney whilst all of the Bengals draftees slowly pail to insigificance. It’s usually the way it goes, but for now, I’m content in saying that the Bengals had the best draft I’ve ever seen – in terms of value, and that is with all joking aside.
How about a real Native? The lovely (and talented) Hyapatia Lee for your viewing pleasure.
Wheat Grinder
But I had heard others describe how a workout increased their energy level, so I decided to experiment. I discovered that a sixty-minute workout during my lunch hour or after 3 p.m. worked wonders. Regular exercise dramatically increased my endurance, making my low periods less low-and I feel better about myself. As an added bonus, I find thinking and praying easier while on the Nordic Track or between weight-lifting sets.
Okay, first things first... confession time. I have seriously been considering not doing my kitchen blog anymore. With Pinterest and Facebook this blog has felt rather redundant to me. Honestly I have a lot of new recipes that I have tried lately but just haven't blogged about. If anyone out there in cyber land cares whether or not this blog lives or dies, let me know. If it is important to you I will keep on keeping on!
“On arriving at the cemetery the firing party, with bowed heads, formed an avenue for the procession to pass through, and, after the final obsequies, ranged on either side of the grave and fired three volleys over the mortal remains, in the intervals of which the bugles sounded the retreat. (Sunset.) After the firing of the last volley they again presented arms and the bugles sounded the Last Post. ... At the end, Mr. Van Heerden thanked the public for their attendance and the many expressions of sympathy to the family.
How proud I was to have purchased my iPad 2 just a few weeks back. Thinking it to be a wise decision. So much lighter than a laptop, easy for my travels, a great tool to blog......Arrrrrghhhhhh. Not so easy as I had hoped. To be honoust I didn't do extensive research simply assuming mister Apple had 'it' all covered. I could not upload any pictures and let's face it.....a blogpost without visuals is like the Tate without its art. The guys in the Apple Store told me to wait for the Cloud. What cloud, I can't just sit around waiting for a cloud. Sorry Steve, this is simply asking too much from this not so patient girl. I have my iPad NOW meaning I want to blog NOW! I could not believe that some clever person had not already found a way around it. So I googled myself 'color blind' searching for a solution and voilà I found an App named Blogsy. Super technical as I am (not) I started to venture into this whole new scary area today promising myself to eat this particular ugly frog first before doing anything else.
The knackered slipper, I’ve sent to my local. The Dog and Wrestler has just been taken over by a couple from County Tyrone after years of neglect, and as part of its refurb, now boasts a menu featuring the resurrected 70s favourite, Chicken & Chips in a basket. Last time I was in they were out of baskets after a rugby lads’ stag night went horribly out of control, so I figure they could use some help.
Several times Paul speaks of himself as being the apostle of the Gentiles and Onesimus was a Gentile. He was one to whom Paul was sent but rather than going to him, the slave came to him. God had such a plan worked out and Onesimus fit into that plan.
She advised me to go and try Virgin Atlantic directly as it'd be cheaper.
All to Thee, my blessèd Savior,
Jeney wrote Arupa (1981) for six to eight ship-bells, a single drum, and a sustained pitch, which here is provided by an electric organ. The drum establishes a steady tempo, which it maintains for the duration of the piece. On the ninth beat, the bells and organ enter. Jeney has devised several rhythmic formulas with varying meters for seven of the the bells, with the eighth bell serving to inform the others of the change in meter. At the start, they play in unison, but after the eighth measure, the players successively advance to the next rhythmic formula, which they will play anywhere from four to eight times. Though the process is somewhat similar to Terry Riley's In C, the use of the bells sounded in constant, rich tone leaves a much different impression. When the rhythmic bells reach the final cell, the instructive bell gives a signal and the piece ends.
Alpha-lipoic acid is a powerful antioxidant that boosts the strength of other antioxidants such as Vitamin C and E, and assists the body’s energy production. Alpha-lipoic acid can be found in spinach, brewer’s yeast, broccoli, tomatoes and peas.
Kombu is known as the “king of seaweeds” and is one of the richest sources of iodine out of all of the sea vegetables. It is an essential staple in the Japanese diet and is used to make Dashi (stock) and has a wonderful Unami taste. It can also be rehydrated and chopped up and added to stews, soups and casseroles. A strip of it added to a pot of beans, while cooking, reduces gas-producing raffinose.
That isn’t to say that I didn’t raise holy hell when I thought he was doing it wrong. I’m still their mother. But I learned that with Rebekkah and Dj, Don was the disciplinarian and I was the comforter. With Caitlyn, I was the disciplinarian and Don was the comforter.
Finalizing the divorce papers will be the start of me putting the cars in my sole name, changing my name back, getting a new drivers license and passport, having to change everything at work, all my credit cards and bank account. It’s insane how much I am going to have to do but each thing is a step towards finalizing the mess, getting over the mess, cleaning up what I have here and starting fresh.
I was in High Point NC last night and stopped by McDonald's for some Dollar Menu Delights:)
Fibonacci series of the flower heads calls her the pentagram of the stars
The wind always
Gemini Cardi
We got to bring her home
14C IMPERIAL INDIA PALE ALE
…there’s currently a buyer’s market in women who are up for just about anything with the right kind of cad, what with delayed marriage (the average age for a woman’s first wedding is now 26, compared with 20 in 1960, according to the University of Virginia-based National Marriage Project’s latest report); reliable contraception; and advances in antibiotics (no more worries about what used to be called venereal disease). No-fault divorce, moreover, has pushed the marriage-dissolution rate up to between 40 and 50 percent and swelled the single-female population with “cougars” in their 30s, 40s, 50s, and beyond. On top of it all is the feminist-driven academic and journalistic culture celebrating that yesterday’s “loose” women are today’s “liberated” women, able to proudly “explore their sexuality” without “getting punished for their lust,” as the feminist writer Naomi Wolf put it in the Guardian in December.
On display beside the Tapestry, there was even a fragment of the thorntree under which Gardiner is said to have lain wounded. He is also purported to have said the heroic words:
The professor whisked me into a cab and we filed a police report. When the rhythm of acting, instead of reacting, established itself he called an old student—the police commissioner of Arusha.
User Score: 8.4
His eyebrows furrowed, "Heather?" No response. "Heather, you know I was just joking." No response. Mark felt a pang in his stomach. Instinctively he held the dart gun in his right hand as his left slowly pulled the pistol on his hip out of its holster. Mark swallowed hard, licked his lips and tried one more time, "Heather, turn around, please." His side arm was already pointed at what he thought was his wife's head, but instead of her beautiful face, he saw the stretched, black skin, and bulging eyes of a Rasling, framed in a wig made to look like Heather's hair. The Rasling flashed a quick grin, and Mark loosed two shots that ruined the couches Heather picked out a couple of months before.
Your common actual living casino would charge a rake high enough that will not make you lose too a lot income out of your winnings however at the same time sustain the company. They’re not hiring the dealers, waitresses along with other staff for no cost! They surely need to shell out to get a total whole lot of other things for instance utility bills and put some cash inside home furniture and other points. It charges a lot to operate casinos so how can they afford all of the expenditures in operating the establishment and still make a decent profit? It’s all within the rakes they consider in.
3. What kind of topography did I grow up in, and how did it influence my physical condition and my concepts of comfort?
"History is littered with wars which everybody knew would never happen," said Enoch Powell.
I am now very happy to announce that the audio story is now finished and available to listen to (for free I hasten to add). Actor Ewan Donald does a skillful job of narrating the story with real feeling and with an authentic sounding American accent to boot! Suffice to say I am over the moon with how the story has turned out.
No problem, right, just pick up another Bible. I can't find any of our other Bibles. I'm in the dark looking stepping over kids . . . people, trying not to wake anyone so locating the other Bibles are made harder this morning.
So for thank you card it was appropriate to use the same theme. I went on line to see what this bird looked like and saw some samples of cards made
69. Saved a favorite childhood toy
Dark soya sauce, ½ teaspoons
Brewers Association President Charlie Papazian stated, "Responsible brewers have successfully used coffee, chocolate and tea to add interesting flavor and complexity to their beers for decades. In fact, the Aztecs brewed a corn, honey and chili-based beer that contained cocoa. Many craft brewers build on these traditions today using coffee, tea and chocolate. On the other hand, the addition of artificial caffeine not from a natural ingredient source has no heritage or tradition in brewing. We support a ban on the direct addition of caffeine." The Brewers Association invites TTB to open up public comment and rulemaking on whether these products are appropriate for responsible consumption.
Charlatans Tremelo song UK
In the end, it doesn’t really matter – the way things look at the moment, Mitt Romney is going to get the GOP nomination. What a prospect! This is a man who believes that some of the lost tribes of Israel settled in America, were visited there by Jesus after his resurrection and left divinely inspired records, written on golden plates in a language called “Reformed Egyptian,” to be discovered by Joseph Smith (guided by angels) nearly eighteen hundred years later. He also believes that God doesn’t want you to drink coffee.
Again, thank you for the response. After this submission I will likely not be around until Monday.
Make the cake mix and separate it into five bowls (the sixth one is the mixing bowl). Mix all the colors of the rainbow except indigo (because it would just be extra purple).
What better way to do so than to jump in at the deep end.
It all sounds a little like Heidelberg University in the 1930s, where a lot of classes were not in session once senior Nazi officials closed them (and their Jewish professors) down, after which Nazis threw what they considered to be “objectionable material” on a bonfire on May 17, 1933. Or maybe it sounds more like classrooms in the Soviet Union when, after the new encyclopedia (whitewash) of Soviet history came out around 1940 or so, all conflicting (read: factual) study materials (and conflicting teachers) were also purged.
Here in Mexico, circumcision is almost unheard of, in either sex (mostly affecting the small Jewish and Muslim population here, as well as American expats). Most of the developed world is also like this, most developed countries having abandoned the practice years ago. Quite frankly the United Shithole of America is the only country in the developed world that still butchers a majority of baby boys at birth. Other countries who routinely practice both male and female circumcision tend to be third world countries with tribal rituals that call for these “procedures” (if you could even call them that) as sort of an initiation to adulthood. Barbaric? Oh absolutely, and I won’t defend any cultural practice that is disgusting.
COVERS
Him saying he has sent circulars asking officials to exercise more discipline is in itself a negligent expression and an act of gross callousness.
instead of a spirit of despair.
The interesting thing about this introductory remark is the use of the word “Tol’dot” (תולדות), which is most often translated as “offspring” or “generations,” but have a much wider meaning that pointing at one’s children (and their children). The word can simply mean “outcome,” “result,” or “consequences,” or as it means in Halachah, “secondary act,” though that is most likely not the case here, but nevertheless an interesting fact in the understanding of the word. It can also be translated as “history,” telling an account about a certain person, which in this case would be Noah.
Academics, Progressives and career politicians know so little about how the real world really works, and for the most part they really don't care!
For the first time there is no plan. No carefully structured and well thought out list of pros and cons, budgets, and backup options.
As the water is heating, cut the pork loin and add it to the water.
Also you need to know people to get anywhere! Well at least that’s what it feels like sometimes. Make sure to stay in touch with all your connections. That’s where social media and emails can come in handy. It’s important to build a relationship with some of your teachers that still work in the field. They know a lot of people! They can be good references and they are usually willing to help. People like bragging about people they know. If your teacher thinks you are awesome then they are clearly going to recommend you to some of their friends.
“I don’t think my life is that interesting,” he said.
Until this moment, I had never known that a dormant redneck was quietly residing inside myself. I had fortunately come across one of the most seemingly honest reality TV shows ever produced—Swamp People.
Not just a dancer, Von Teese in involved in every aspect of her shows, from light design to music to costuming. She’s appeared as a guest on television shows, has a vintage-inspired lingerie line called Von Follies, a clothing line called Muse, a perfume, and is a best-selling author who is currently working on her third book, a guide to eccentric glamour. As a style icon who continually reigns supreme on best dressed lists around the world and who has worked with designers such as Marc Jacobs, Christian Louboutin, Louis Vuitton, and Chopard, Von Teese continually advocates the beauty of curvaceous women, firmly believing that classic glamour is created through an inner light and passion, and is not dictated by size or age.
Since I live Down Under, I have never been to a Comic Con event. Please comment below & tell me your experience at Comic Con if you’ve ever attended one. Would love to hear all about it.
Natural remedies are safe and effective. There have been very few times over the years that our family has resorted to drugs for treatment. With four children from 19-10 years old, I can tell you, from experience, that you can be successful using natural remedies. One of the greatest benefits is that they do not compromise your FUTURE health, like so many drugs do. Natural remedies build up the immune system, and I know that that is one reason why my children are rarely sick. We do not stock any drugs in our home. Our cupboards are full of tinctures, salves, herbal powders, essential oils, and other natural treatments.
Paper - Magnolia
How do we feel about these two cases? I suspect we’d feel that Mike from Case D should be exempt from liability: his idle fantasies are exactly the kind of thing we want to protect from government intervention in a liberal society. But how about Mike from Case C? What he did was clearly less culpable than what he did in case B, but we might still feel like some intervention, or minimal form of liability is merited. Indeed, the criminal law can allow for some liability through the offence of conspiracy. However, by allowing for this we’ve definitely begun to slide from pure liberalism. That might be a perfectly acceptable thing to do — a capacity for nuance and an appreciation for the moral complexity of the real world are qualities we might like the criminal justice system to exemplify — but we have to consider where the boundaries should be drawn, if at all.
Just another fool who threw away millions of dollars. No sympathy here.
(Note: The ebook doesn't contain Compartments by Zoran Zivkovic)
Up until three and a half weeks ago, Herbert and I (the fine machine I drive, his name is Herbert) were getting along famously. Maintained nearly to perfection, this automobile has no body damage — enterprise taught me how to look for that — the same 1985 interior (we’re talking corduroy everywhere: on the doors, on the seats, on the head rests), probably the original stereo that can only get channels 91.5, 94.7, 95.5, and on a “good day” 100.3, the same hubcaps, a steering column that does not stay still in one locked position due to the previous owners jostling, and the smell of all things old. Three and a half weeks ago, Herbert decided not to start. The car with less than 100,000 miles (yes, you’re reading that correctly), would turn over, but not start. After a stop at Taco Bell that seemed like Herbert’s final resting place, a call to Triple A, and a trip to the mechanic, Herbert functions much like a 90-year-old man. He cannot drive for an hour after he has been driven. To be on the safe side, two hours is best. He sleeps for many hours of the day while I am at work. He starts best after a full night of sleep in the driveway. Herbert was a “steal of a deal” purchase.
"You know when I first thought I might have a chance? When I realized that you could go into any bar in the country and insult Lyndon Johnson and nobody would punch you in the nose." -- Eugene McCarthy
Never been to Berlin, but I really really want to go. And soon!
Dwight, like T. Roosevelt at first glance does not seem fairly socialist. He was a Republican. He was a five-star general who put all of Western Europe under the stars and stripes. He became the super commander of NATO, intervened in Iran and Guatemala to topple left leaning democratic leaders and replace them in national interest. But all this doesn’t diminish his socialist aspect. After all, did not Trotsky believe in a world revolution? Did not the Comintern specialise in the creation in the contamination of precious bodily fluids across the world? The fact remains that although Ike fought the Soviets back like a true patriotic son, his national policy would be condemned as socialist if put forward today. What did he do? Well for starters the top tax rate in Eisenhower’s reign was 94%. Today Obama’s trying on his class warfare to raise it to 40%. He ordered the state build highways, rather than rely on friendly private corporations and expanded exponentially on the disgusting social security FDR forced on the brave American populace. He also tyrannically placed in troops to enforce educational integration at Little Rock, Arkansas. Astronomical taxes, builds autobahns, gives money to filthy poor folk, makes war on conservative values. Eisenhower is undoubtedly a Red. If only McCarthy had spotted him and acted accordingly.
Illustrator: Lee White
Here are some tips and tricks to help you become more aware and slow down while you eat.
We are not allowed to communicate
This was their last day. I guess the boss is coming up with a game plan? Austin's on the left...totally cut out, but I think his jeans are funny....and he totally got made fun of...obviously.
Just when we started to believe it was finally spring here in Saskatchewan it started snowing again. 3 days of light snow and major depression! I'm in hibernation mood again due to a combination of third trimester syndrome and weather no doubt. I'm so bummed about it it is not even funny. I have countless painting projects in waiting not to mention a tone of yard work to do (or supervise!) before Mr. Man takes off for the whole summer. This snow has got to go and FAST!
It works every time. Choose which one you want to emphasise and the ratio of one to the other and off you go.
I would empower unelected bureaucrats to all-but-outlaw America’s most abundant sources of energy. And after banning its use in America, I’d make it illegal for American companies to ship it overseas.
Anyone can now quickly and easily discover their own poker skill level and poker bonusobjectively with these kinds of guidelines and research now available online. If you combine this skills information with proper study, then it becomes easy to make possible for players to quickly learn their game and become skilled players much faster than ever before. .
You can see my ECO rack with the hippie COEXIST sticker on it. I actually used a rack and pannier on the ACT ride and got a lot of flack from the roadies. Haters gon’ hate.
The book starts out interestingly, as it begins (small spoiler) with Francesca poisoning the man who took over as Borgia’s poisoner (an actual position within many families in Rome? I could definitely believe it) after her father, who originally held the position, was murdered in the streets. The poisoner had many duties for the family, most of which included merely protecting the family from being poisoned.
solid full frontal I
Kenny West (REP) 2.05% 52
When you decide to work in your home full time, often you may have to spend sometime moving things around to better suit how you will work. Modern homes and renovated home are usually set up more for entertaining than for home production and family life. At the very least you should set up your kitchen to suit how you work but if that works well, maybe you can move and rejig how the rest of the house works for you too. Forget about what others are thinking - live as you wish, develop your skills and your self confidence and become more self reliant. There is no greater gift you can give to a child than to be there, to express love and support and to show them that the life you've built makes you happy. If you can do that, you'll be a fine role model along with being a fine parent.
I asked for the publication date and was told it would be this September. So I've been checking the website of the Spanish publisher and ... it's not there!
Next comes the Affidavit of Merit. This is, literally, a doctor’s note that says that the case has merit. In order to get one, the Plaintiff must find a doctor of equal standing to the Defendant (if there are more than one defendant or if one of the defendants is the hospital, things get a little hinkey–hinkey always favors the defense). This doctor must be willing, then to testify against another doctor that what the Defendant doctor did was “against the standard of care” in a sworn statement. The doctor’s note saying that the Defendant doctor did something bad.
Check me out... posting this on a Monday!!
He got the nickname Roo while he was still riding in the belly - I'm sure that it was not a very amusing observation at the time, but I certainly resembled a Kangaroo (without the tail.) The name stuck, and now I'll be the mamita to a marsupial forever. Or at least until he becomes a teenager and nothing is funny!
This Singer handcrank is perhaps my favorite machine in Johanna's collection (which includes a Singer 301, a Bernina, Kenmores, and more). If I'd had bigger pockets, I might have grabbed it on my way out.
"hhhhhhhh...."
The Grumman OV-1 Mohawk is an armed military observation and attack aircraft, designed for battlefield surveillance and light strike capabilities. It is of twin turboprop configuration, and carried two crew members with side by side seating. The Mohawk was intended to operate from short, unimproved runways in support of United States Army maneuver forces
1) Put the chopped apple in a pan with the honey, and add a little water until the apple is just covered.
Cara: It’s about a 15-year-old girl named Mia, a high-school sophomore growing up in a college town in upstate New York, who has a bit of trouble controlling her impulses. When she gets caught shoplifting, her mother gives her an ultimatum—get a job and pay off your debts or else you’ll be out your own.
As well as a journey through the geographical landscape, the novel is at least as much a journey through the spiritual landscape of Late Roman Britain. Roman gods, British goddesses, the soldiers’ cult of Mithras and Christianity all play a role, and the ancient myth of Proserpina/Persephone and her abduction by Hades is a key component. The characters believe in omens, portents and supernatural powers; this is a world where a strange dog can be a sign from the gods. Vilbia in particular is seeking a renewal of her faith in the goddess she serves, and even the outwardly materialistic Canio seems to be searching as much for spiritual meaning and human contact as for the hidden gold. All the apparently supernatural events are at least ambiguous, capable of some natural explanation or possibly confined to the characters’ imaginations, so it is up to the reader to decide whether to share the characters’ beliefs.
in the history of the universe, I somehow figured out how to make it even better. My only competition is myself and I always win. Conversely, I guess that means I always lose too. Either way, this clam chowder is creamier and more comforting than a lactating angel’s teat.
I decided to make red beet eggs for the family. I hard boiled them yesterday. Hubby must have been busy some time last night... This is what I found when I went to peel the eggs.
“Amorous games! Not searching for mother’s milk?” I asked. Renate went on to tell me how the cat had always played these games when her husband was watching. But Eugen had lost his patience and kicked the cat out of their bed.”
If your package is over the USPS limit we can send it to you by FedEx. We have a big discount on FedEx pricing and we will pass that discount to you.
it also means i havent had a lot of knitting time, although i am finding by sticking to only a few things i am making some progress. for example, the restarted wasabi pea socks are now at the heel (turned it today)
Say what you need to say.
These reports provide strong evidence to support a more integrated approach in the treatment of gastro-intestinal disorders in which hypnotherapy and psychotherapy should be considered in the initial stages of the disorder as valuable aids and alternatives to conventional treatment.
I already have a room mom volunteer. I had a mom ask me "How can you use me to help?" EVERY supply that I said to throw on the back counter was totally sorted into beautiful piles. What can I say...I'm in love already! One little man sang his ABC's to me...so proud. One mom gushed over my moodle site and said her son is loving playing the learning games on there...and that they already printed out the sight words to practice with him! I heard, "I was hoping it would be you!" (...first time I've ever been told that!) In short, I am in teacher heaven tonight...budget whoas be da**ed! I was emotionally a mess all week listening to the harbingers of economic doom...the whisperings of the huge RIF to come this spring...no money for this...no money for that... How does one start the year with a positive attitude (energy, excitement, creativity, etc) knowing that she is second from the bottom of the seniority list and that no matter how small (or big) an impending RIF is...she is done come June????? Well...give her the class of her dreams seems to be the answer. I am on cloud nine and soooooooo thankful.
In local government the only concession is to delay the attacks on pensions until 2014, provided that local government unions promise to accept the pain without a fight when it comes.
A new critique, published as a chapter in the new textbook "Calendars and Years II: Astronomy and Time in the Ancient and Medieval World" (Oxbow Books, 2010), argues that the accepted conversions of dates from Mayan to the modern calendar may be off by as much as 50 or 100 years. That would throw the supposed and overhyped 2012 apocalypse off by decades and cast into doubt the dates of historical Mayan events. (The doomsday worries are based on the fact that the Mayan calendar ends in 2012, much as our year ends on Dec. 31.)
Pinch of Sea Salt
This question lit up a bulb in Eduardo’s minh. He replied:” Catanduva”
On one hand, I value public information and grew up with a system where most court information is public; I've grown comfortable (complacent?) with that system, I'll admit, and it's been a long time since I've seriously considered my own first-order assumptions on that topic. On the other hand, much US crime coverage is quite poor, sensationalistic, frequently misleading, one-sided, and often flat-out counterproductive. In Texas, there are at most half a dozen news reporters who I consider to produce high-quality crime beat coverage, and most of the rest often do more harm than good. That's not a great ratio.
A couple of weeks back I was at a swanky cafe at a nearby beach and they were selling giant chocolate freckles at $6 each and freckle pops at $4 each which totally reminded me that last year my daughter and I made my parents Easter grab-bags that included giant chocolate freckles. (And they loved them!) So I thought we would do it again.
4) THE GIGGLER – Pat & the Wildcats
Katja Vaghi
Thanks for stopping by..............
"You shouldn't just say "I do", a marriage is supposed to be forever - you are the reason society is flawed."
April 10 2009 – PRETORIA, Pierre van Ryneveld suburb -- An armed man who was part of a three-member hijacking gang which had stolen a car at gunpoint outside a nursery school in Pretoria, was shot dead after a hot pursuit through fenced-in backyards by citizens' patrols and the police on Thursday.
When we finally finished eyehumping the knights, we made our way to the parking lot, exhausted and ready to get back to the hotel and finish our dranking there. The end of the road trip was near, and we were all sad that the fun things we had planned were over.
It's my turn here at Crafty Cardmakers to come up with a challenge, and they say to take inspiration from something you love, and I love food! I am surrounded by lots of inspiration in my evening job, and one night, whilst folding boxes I came up with an idea that one of the boxes we use to serve up combos with would be perfect for a makeover. I painted it with white acrylic paint, then waited for it to dry before overspraying with Adirondack color wash, then when that was dried, stamped over it with a variety of swooshy stamps using Stazon ink. It has two holes for dips which are perfect to put tealights in (the battery operated kind unless you want to set fire to your box lol) and lined with shredded tissue paper, it is perfect as a little gift box. I have placed a tealight garden hanger in it, but with a little modification and maybe the addition of a mirror to the lid, it could be used for keeping make-up or jewellery in. Or anything at all which you want to give as a gift!
Sure, I use technology – after all, I’m typing this on a computer with two screens so I can have a web site open while responding to a student’s email. However, technology is a tool for me, not an end in itself. The technology doesn’t control what I do (yeah – right!) – I use it to do what I have always done, write about books and communicate with others, but in a different format. Even my office voice messages are sent to my email as wav files so I can listen to them on my computer. Would I like to go back to the days of snail mail and phone calls? In a minute, or at least on most days! I love talking to Mary on the phone, but note I am so multi-task oriented now that I am also clearing off my desk, sorting through review book, unloading the dishwasher, etc. So, I am not truly absorbing the delight of hearing my daughter talk about my wonderful grandchildren and her life. I’m not like my mom who I knew was sitting with a cup of coffee, (and sadly, a cigarette) as we talked on the phone. She gave me her undivided attention. Why can’t we seem to do that anymore? We aren’t even upset by the sound of the keyboard or mouse clicks as we talk to colleagues and friends on the phone. We know they are multitasking just like we are but in reality we don’t seem to be giving any one thing/person our undivided attention any more. It is well past the time of making New Year’s resolutions, and perhaps I am saying this because I can no longer multi-task with the finesse I used to, but to Hades with multi-tasking!! It fries the brain and in many cases it is just downright rude. For Pete’s sake - I don’t want to hear about someone else’s life as she talks on her cell phone while using a public restroom! Yup – I’ve turned into a curmudgeon!!
It's time for me to follow through
The airline issued a statement on Friday saying it sympathized with Meekins, but that making an exception to its well-known policy would force the cost of providing refunds on to other customers. On Monday, Pinson reaffirmed that Spirit is standing by its decision and its policy. She also noted customers have the option of buying travel insurance, which could help them get their money back, an option Meekins apparently did not choose.
— Never plagiarize.
Which will be fun fun fun!
I was steadily ahead of pace. At one point I had over an 8 minute lead on getting the 2:30! I tried not to let that distract me. I didn't want to get excited and then mess it up. Steady as she goes, I just kept focusing on my breathing and finding the flattest parts to run on since I could already tell my IT Band was hurting after the long stretch on the banked road of Amazon Parkway. I was in disbelief as I passed Hayward Field and saw how ahead of schedule I was - but fortunately I didn't get cocky. As tradition has it, my body revolted. My stomach wasn't happy. The last 5K was hard. I was alternating between walking and running too frequently. I debated getting sick and then continuing strong, but it just never happened (deja vous from last year)! I saw my lead slipping away from myself, but still felt confident. When I was running I was still "fast" (heh) and I'd push it until my stomach said NO.
Once you are out of the rack, set your feet wider then your hips and point your toes slightly outward. Before you start the decent keep your weight in your heels and towards the outsides of your feet. NOW, take a deep breath and hold it. MAKE SURE YOU KEEP YOUR PROUD CHEST AND STICK YOUR BUTT OUT.
The targets are in high sec for two reasons.
Mijnbestseller.nl is an initiative of Paul van Bekkum, former director of the Eindhoven Dagblad, and Robert Bosma, a former line manager at Wegener. "The book world is on the verge of a revolution," says van Bekkum. "Printing on demand makes it possible for anyone to publish a book, search engines and social media make sure that the book can be found and sold."
* “Fucking Hostile”
Pour in the eggs and season to taste. Cook stirring once or twice for 30 seconds.
*Topical Index
Maybe a hanging bin to place folders or art?
To reiterate, the main bottled beer list must be a consistent, readily obtainable, everyday guide to the panoply of world beer styles as defined by the BJCP. This mission duly accomplished, seasonal and specialty offerings ranging from Oktoberfests (September) to Pumpkin Ales (late autumn) to Doppelbocks (March), and including Lambics, Ciders and Meads, can be drawn from the hundreds of other available brands to populate monthly, quarterly or purely whimsical side lists materializing on a rotating basis.
Why not become a Lad? Suggests some complete idiot whose probably related to me. There’s plenty of them, they’re totes tough and they already have a reputation for acting like dickheads and episodes of random wanton violence. That’s all very well, I counter, except it goes against all of the values I have, and everything I hold dear. Seriously, if I wanted to turn my body into advertising space for multinational corporations and attack passers-by, I’d become a billboard or a violent schizophrenic. If anything I want to form a gang that goes against the Lad concept. Anti-materialist and mutual defence rather than recreational violence. If you’re not from Australia and have no idea what I’m talking about check this informative video. Or this short unrefined video that contains lots of fighting and stuff for all of you troglodytes out there.
Partner with another brewer.
3 juin 1910
5.Report Suspicious Activity "1-800-Destroy" from Destroy All Evidence
Similarly in 2008 we got to vote on the option of a local Congestion Charge, which meant my parents would’ve had to cough up just to go to the local shops, and the organisers were quite surprised when northerners resoundingly told them, in ballot form, to buggar off.
MW: Well Fernando and I spoke about it. The right hand side looked pretty good in those greasy conditions so that’s the way it went today. I am not really bothered about that to be honest. The race wasn’t won or lost there. Seb did a good pace on the inters and we were pretty evenly apart. Pace wise too-ing and fro-ing a little bit when the inters were going off. Then the pit stops started and all of us had different types of strategies, different in and out laps, and the pit-stops weren’t the smoothest today so all in all it was where we didn’t perform to the maximum. Fernando definitely deserved to win the grand prix, no question about it. He drove very, very well. The team did a great job so Ferrari deserved to win. I finished third.
New Belgium Hoptoberfest- hopped up blond ale
Still, if you count the sort of show-biz versions of Irish culture like Celtic Woman or 'Riverdance', it is not quite dead, though I would say it lacks much of the grassroots character that it had in better times.
This is my final entry for the Digi Doodle Shop Design Team. I will greatly miss this wonderful team. The one consolation is that I will still be able to shop and get their gorgeous images. Keep those animals coming! I have been struggling with my artwork lately and am not really satisfied with how I'm doing. I am planning on taking some classes so I can better learn shading and some other coloring techniques. A natural born artist I am not.
London, 1887. Part stoic gentleman, part fearless Yard man, Zeno “Zak” Kennedy is an enigma of the first order. For years, the memory of a deadly bombing at King’s Cross has haunted the brilliant Scotland Yard detective. His investigation has zeroed in on a ring of aristocratic rebels whose bloody campaign for Irish revolution is terrorizing the city. When he discovers one of the treacherous lords is acquainted with his free-spirited new tenant, Cassandra St. Cloud, his inquiry pulls him unexpectedly close to the heart of the conspiracy—and into the arms of a most intriguing lady.
Prima Donna Blond Lager
はち：ＩＰＡ？
Cardinal Brady was in a position of trust that awarded him the responsibly of interviewing victims and reporting to his superiors except for the children’s parents who were conveniently kept in the dark to protect pedophile Fr. Smyth.Because the veil of secrecy was allowed to continue two of the four children being abused were so after the 1975 inquiry
Takai also discussed the Army’s new enterprise email system and what it means for other branches of the military. The Army’s system is built in the Defense Information Systems Agency’s private cloud. She said she would like to see others use it if they see value in it.
They know there is something wrong. They know it has something to do with Wall Street and Washington.
So I decided it started then and there. Healthy eating and exercising, water, loving myself, they all deserve to be priorities.
Today, let's take it from the top: your head.
The winner will be announced Monday 13 August. If we get two or more outstanding entries, we may offer representation to more than one writer.'
2 details
DR. Richard Wiseman, a psychologist, once conducted a research. He gathered many volunteers, and asked them, “Based on your experiences in life, do you think you are lucky or unlucky?” He also conducted a personal interview with the volunteers to see why they think so. Then finally, he asked the same ‘imagine’ question above.
Archdeacons
Have a lovely weekend everyone
- Age Range: Birth and Up
@ Bar Petite
The other day I went to have a class with the great Jorge Dispari and Marita "La Turca". There were 5 of us in the whole class. 4 of us were tourists, the other was a great friend of the family and goes to classes everyday. This is not Pablo and Dana or Frumboli's class, this is the most traditional of teachers who refuses to teach figures and only teaches walking. 4 "tourists" versus 1 local. And I find that the ratio, though not so steep, is always like this, even in milongas. Yesterday in Sunderland there were at least 50 "tourists" in a milonga with 200 people. I was only hit once in the milonga. Strangely enough, it was an old milonguero (who promptly apologised!). A good milonga, definitely yes. Would it survive without tourists (definitely yes). Would it be the same, no, it would lose quite a lot.
4. A new manga by the name of Senyu, will start it’s serialisation in Jump SQ on May 4th.
Wow, I really lucked out this time. Found a see through goodie box I'd made last year and never did use, in fact, I found 8 of them, all with different DP. So I stuck some candy in it, made the ornament, and tied it on with a bow. Can't get much easier than this now can it. What have you put away and forgot about that will only take you a short while to complete and share?? We'd love to see it!
Zimmerman following Martin was foolish, but I don't believe it was a crime, and it is really immaterial in my opinion.
3/4 C crème fraîche
Accessories: Perfect Pennant Bigz Die, Word Window Punch, Ticket Corner Punch, Brights Buttons, Polka Dot Ribbon (unknown), Scallop Trim Border Punch, Scallop Circle Punch (DUH!), Dimensionals
Let's be honest, some days you feel like everyone is on your back.
I recognized what happened in an instant…. the synergy that is present between me and my landlady created an enhanced energy field in my house that I could tap into effortlessly.
If at first you DO succeed, try not to look so astonished.
Crowded House Chocolat cake NZ
This Annabel Arden production, a revival, is set in the 50s (I think opera directors need to be told that other decades are available for updating into as well) in a Mediterranean village square, and though this makes the quack potion seller around which the plot is centred far less credible, it doesn't matter at all, because a) it's a Donizetti comedy, and b) it's done with so much love and warmth and style that you can't help but be carried away by it. What's so surprising about this opera is how good the libretto is - in a good production like this one, it provides a brilliant and insightful (not to mention genuinely witty) commentary on the nature of human lust, love and relationships. It helps when the acting and direction is as detailed and subtle as it is here, and against the odds I really felt that I was watching believable characters on stage. All this from a Donizetti comedy - not the place you usually go for insight into the human condition! Musically, this is far from my favourite bel canto score it has to be said, but I almost forgot this tonight - and the cast were very good.
All that we have discovered about the correlations between the brain and experience still holds true. This is usually the case with a paradigm shift; the new includes the old. But it also resolves the anomaly that the old could not explain. In this case, we no longer need scratch our heads wondering how the brain generates the capacity for experience.
Thanks for letting me get that off my chest. Now I’m off to go shoot me a kiy-oot and pluck that there grouse for some tasty vittles tonight. Or maybe clean the igloo. It’s about that time.
disclaimer: this is my blog, therefore it is my opinion. I am not a doctor, nor do I play one on TV. If you don’t like my opinion, I am okay with that. Just be kind when expressing your opinion here.
obama’s fractured-fairy tale version of Constitutional law may have been the first shot fired in a ploy to use the obamacare ruling in the election. Or, as fellow true liberal and political commentator, John Smart, surmised, “he lost his temper because he didn’t get his way. That’s how narcissistic personalities act.”
Last week, the comic strip Get Fuzzy by Darby Conley decided to have some fun at “The Beautiful Game’s” expense. My dad enjoyed them so much he mailed them to me, so I have decided to share them with you, although without the use of the Postal Service since I’m not entirely certain that I remember how to mail things. All are (c) Darby Conley and are reprinted only because I found them amusing. I hope he doesn’t sue me.
Are people sick? Yes!
Two, all those "lifestyle" magazines for women? Cosmopolitan and the likes? They're just plain wrong. I don't know what they are right about, or of what use they are to society. 35 out of 50 ways to please your men is not to make him a sandwich, or to give him a blowjob, or to make him a sandwich while giving him a blowjob. If you're dating that kind of man, you need to reconsider your life choices ... or whether you're genuinely happy playing that role. These magazines are out to instill fear in women, scaring us with stories of how men watch too much porn, and obsess over the likes of Sasha Grey, that they like their hand more than they like you. (Realization courtesy of the bf.) None of these are true! Even if it is true and you think that's a concern, it applies mostly to men who are assholes, and that is an apriori concern, not your sex life.
Anyway, Shirley is puttering around the house, mourning the loss of her little son Bobby. In fact all she has are her memories...and the fact that little Bobby is now a greenish yellow plasma-outlined ghost-type thing that wanders all around the house, and occasionally wants her to read from a gigantic white book full of scary stories. Which Shirley willingly does when she is not being distracted by random gusts of air/spiritual passing-through effects blowing in her face and, from the looks of it, she's getting a little too much pleasure from. I guess it's the after-effects of all that doll-lovin' from last time.
"I powdered it on until it was covered," Spievack recalled.
Kirk is soon engaged in a race against time as he escapes from the Schism and sets out to warn a fledgling colony of platypus shifters who have been detected by the space amplifier. But what he discovers about why he ended up in the Mattock Markets will change the course of his life forever. Not only must he survive to help so many others, he must become a man, too.
This is called the idea of “locality.” Every signal is supposed to be local in the sense that it must take a finite time to travel through space. And yet, Aspect’s photons—the photons emitted by the atom in Aspect’s experiment—influence one another, at a distance, without exchanging signals because they are doing it instantaneously—they are doing it faster than the speed of light. And therefore it follows that the influence could not have traveled through space. Instead the influence must belong to a domain of reality that we must recognize as the transcendent domain of reality.
Up in The Air- Walter Kirn (p)
The call went out many years ago for Gaia and all her inhabitants to rise in consciousness to avoid devastation during this very intense cycle of change. The frequencies of higher love, harmony, understanding, inclusion, and compassion were waiting to baptize this realm of the galactic family and that order of business would guarantee that evolved consciousness would have its own dwelling place where it is able to grow and develop unhindered by the dismissal needs of such attitudes as greed, gluttony, and power.
Graciously, he's willing to do that while off I go to the big blue ocean, to reconnect with a life I hardly remember.
Well, this week was not the week to get this done. K spiked a 103 fever on Sunday through Monday night and the week went downhill from there. So, the new plan is to get this project done next week and if I can get some vacuuming done before Sunday I'll be a happy person. Wish me luck!
once again, my friends, i have turned to my all-time favorite tool: spraypaint (is that a tool?)
From April 2012 , the company was was rebranded as Orange and would operate under the Orange brand
She sat up in the tub.
When I think about that commercial it makes me laugh out loud. The thought that people put so much time and effort into their retirement number is ridiculous. The number becomes an identity. It’s an unnecessary burden placed on a persons shoulders. It makes us do crazy things like: never take a family vacation, stock pile a 401(k) instead of giving a portion to a local shelter in need, or spend quality time checking your portfolio instead of drinking tea on the porch with your spouse and enjoying the conversation.
We need to exercise and keep healthy all three parts of our existence. I like walking; walking a lot…
Unfortunately I'm not very pleased with the end result. I don't think my colouring has done the adorable image any justice, and I'm not a great lover of green. But I liked the papers and picked them before I coloured the image.
Ugh...
BORING, right? Actually, not at all. Here are some really cool photo’s that my friend sent me. These are called ‘It’s hard to say which is more amazing, the animals or the photography?!’
If you do accidentally get caught in the tractor-beam-eyes and are nice enough to stop, beware, you might be in the conversational claws of a sight-seeing chatterbox. If they don't want to hear your entire life story and how you deal with the French, they probably want to tell you all about their long-lost cousin or auntie who moved to some other country and was totally miserable. If you hear the key phrase "My so-and-so moved to..." you need to bolt. Your house is on fire, your friend was hit by a run-away subway car... say whatever you can, but get a move-on before the story eats up an hour of your precious time.
And heads unbowing
The Knight’s Tomb
But if you were building an argument for the true rock novel being as unselfconscious about rock as possible, "The Pets" could be Exhibit A. More than most fiction that concerns itself with music, Bragi's novel captures the dark side of rock -- paranoia, fear, self-doubt and the cowardice that's sometimes, maybe often, the flip side of rock-star braggadocio.
For me this was a great example of the power of enthusiasm. Within a more holy realm, I’ve seen worship leaders destroy an amazing session of praise and worship by scolding the worshipers trying to encourage them to sing louder or longer or better, raise their hands or lower their hands. On the opposite side, when the worship leader is enthusiastic and excited about praising God, the people respond with increased joy and enthusiasm.
for my card I used the following ........
We ended the lesson with the kids on our backs as we all played sharks and minnows across the pool, having our little sharks yell “ONE, TWO, THREE, MINNOWS GO!” Though this was not the primary aim of the activity, as their teacher I couldn’t help but get excited that they were learning English words too! It gave us the chance to teach and reiterate words like kick, swim, under, other side, fish, shark, and more! To top it all off, during the five minutes of free time in the shallow children’s pool after the lesson, I heard them giggling as they yelled the English words out and practiced swimming some more on their own.
The Start:
Second, for those curious minds. Yes Devin has officially QUIT school. Or rather I should say the school has officially kicked him out for missing so many days. That I believe was his end goal so he could say they kicked him out, he didn't quit.
I wish I could chase away the cloud
We knew what was coming.
Stairs to my Apartment. Someone took all the trouble to lit up the entire stairs of my apartment with diyas (an earthen oil lamp). On a regular day, my apartment stairs looks more like a haunted place where anything horrible can happen.
Chantelle's 16th
That means don’t beat yourself up for being a perfectaholic – instead recognize that you have a unique challenge and a chance to greatly improve your life and your creative process once you’ve addressed it! Read up about the psychology of addiction, OCD and other similar mental illnesses.
“An iPad! An iPad! An iPad!”
I might pop by from time to time as everything is subject to change, but for now I am taking some time off-line. I will see you soon.
1 masculinity
created by Cornerstoregoddess/Eleanor Burian-Mohr
I finally finished the playroom and am hoping to get some pictures up, soon. Maybe tomorrow. Now that my to-do list is pretty much down to frivolous things that I kind of made up for the sake of writing something down, I should have more time to blog. And nap. And wait.
So, in keeping with this resolution, although I don’t have my FTL logs from the weekend, I do have one left over from last week. Without further ado…
As you may have gathered, the transition from gear head single-speeder wasn’t quite as painless (literally) as I thought it would be, but I think it was worth it. Single-speed isn’t for everyone, but for commuting in a flat coastal city it’s certainly worth a try.
Sara starts going out with the other girls to clubs and parties and stuff, and hijinks ensue when one of the girls leaves her there on her own even though she doesn’t know the area! Rebecca comes to meet her later, and she and Sara go walking around town, taking pictures for their Facebook profiles (which will never actually be shown, considering the makers of the movie could not pony up enough money to use Facebook’s likeness in the film). Then Sara reveals that she tattooed her sister’s name onto her chest in remembrance of her tragic death several years earlier! Ha ha ha! Oh, how silly…wait, I think that was supposed to be a serious part…maybe…?
Remember we have validation in model? Now we can use it, by calling validate(), and check using the isValid(), if it’s not valid, we’ll call the reject() to discard changes. Pretty straight forward.
Gold Thornbridge Jaipur 5.9
I stood by the railings looking at the gold glinting in the sun and felt a tap on the shoulder. I turned to see a very tall, distinguished and impeccably dressed man who introduced himself as Sedley Andrus, Lancaster Herald of Arms. He asked if I should like to go inside and see the coats of arms. I was shown books on heraldry and introduced to an artist working in his Dickensian attic, He was painting a red eagle on a piece of vellum and the colours jumped out at me. I still feel that sense of excitement when I see colour on vellum.The artist was the late Norman Mainwaring who was at the time considered to be the chief herald painter at the College.
He stressed that under no circumstances will the Brotherhood recognize the State of Israel.
- She still hates nursery, much to our dismay.
If you look, you'll see that the boy in the cover is holding a microphone. He's a famous musical prodigy, who froze on stage during a televised talent contest and he's hiding out from the paparazzi in the Pinelands of New Jersey. But it's a small town. And so it's very possible that people will find out.
Then, that dark day that had been looming on the horizon finally arrived– I moved into my own apartment. The first night, I forgot about a frozen pizza in the tiny playhouse-sized “oven” and the smoke alarm wailed about my transgression like I’d intentionally doused the place in kerosene, dancing in circles while slinging lit books of matches. If you’ve never tried to shut one off in an apartment with eleven foot ceilings when you do not own a ladder, then you don’t know which pieces of your furniture to precariously stack on others, do you? I learned– quickly.
- Johnb, London, 01/3/2012 16:19
Adieu to all and keep fighting the good fight,
I want you to follow me only because you truly want to follow me!
I've read two out of the four launch titles and think they've made some really good choices.
From the fruitful day
Tailback
A source inside Clarence House has confirmed that the royal couple have suffered no ill effects from the attack. Speaking off the record she said "Both Prince Charles and Lady Camilla do not seem to have been affected by the behavior of these oiks in fact Camilla is looking 30 years younger. It's just like having the old Queen Mum back.
OK, notice anything else?
So once again the opportunity arises for the healing that happens in the absence of identification.
Film maker, Jason Vance is one such frustrated Utahan. Jason has been working on Behind Zion's Curtain, a documentary that tries to bring the tainted agency's shadowy underbelly in to the light.
By guest writer, Annie Lawrence.
So in true Diner style, the task for my fiancée-to-be is simple: print off the following list (tabularise it if necessary), blu-tack it to the wall, and get watching. Once all films are crossed off, all boxes checked, then – and only then – will I consider marriage.
Tsubasa Masuwaka is one of my favorite Japanese model for Japan Street Fashion look! Especially her famous DollyWink products that you can see her posing sweetly on the packaging! I had tried the her Dollywink products so I hop on to try out her range of circle lens.
Directed by Ruben Fleischer (“Zombieland”), “Gangster Squad” — which is based on Paul Lieberman’s seven-part Los Angeles Times series “Tales From The Gangster Squad” — was initially locked into an October release date, but was moved to “TBD” in favor of Ben Affleck’s “Argo.” Still, discounting this one as anything other than an early Oscar player seems foolish. In addition to Penn (seemingly using Leonardo DiCaprio’s leftover makeup from “J. Edgar”), Gosling and Stone, the cast includes Josh Brolin, Anthony Mackie, Giovanni Ribisi, Robert Patrick and Nick Nolte. That’s a great roster and all, but let’s focus back on Gosling and Stone.
I am in my seventies and have been wrestling with these questions for more than a half century. My journey has taken me to a different place than McLaren’s has. I have come to understand that I may never understand God’s ways. I have come to realize that God ways are inscrutable and while I may continue to seek and gain wisdom, I will have to be content with a limited knowledge of God and His ways.
I talked to the kids some about their role in the planting. They are looking forward to being a part of the garden again. They really do enjoy it. M and G are thinking about starting extra seeds this year to sell to people they know. I think it would be an excellent way for them to make some extra money.
Many things make me happy but the one I put down was a "long walk on a beautiful day," which is what I got to enjoy Sunday afternoon (in case you're wondering, the lady in the photo isn't me - for one thing I've got dark hair, and it rarely stays in a neat ponytail).
Pita pizza with mushrooms, onions, garlic, green bell pepper, pickled hot banana peppers, sliced tomatoes, nutritional yeast sauce, basil & dried chipotle.
Just a day before watching this video, I saw the movie The Hitchhikers Guide to the Galaxy for the first time, having made a few unsuccessful attempts to read the Douglas Adams novel on which it was based, and for much the same reasons as Carroll’s Alice in Wonderland.
I don't know what it is, perhaps I just think that the two that are together should "go together"...???
Boones Farm
They dance along behind him and they cry:
blow it away yeah
ONG AK, SRIMANUNTHIPHOL J, FRANKEL RI. Influenza vaccination status of healthcare workers and the extent of their domistic contact with individuals at high risk for influenza-related complications. Infect Control Hosp Epidemiol 2000; 21: 735-737.
- Andy's (128 Montague Street): C, 51 violation points
Also, congratulations have to go to Shepherd Neame for which took a bronze in the best bitter category, it's not one that I personally drink much of but for the people of Kent it's a positive institution and we should be owning that category anyway dammit! Bitter's ours!!!!
Derived from the same NAHB survey, the Multifamily Vacancy Index (MVI) measures property owners’ perception of vacancies in existing rental apartments. The MVI decreased from 36.1 in the second quarter to 35.1 in the third quarter. With the MVI, lower numbers indicate fewer vacancies. The MVI has improved considerably since reaching a peak of 70.2 in the second quarter of 2009.
The picture I hope comes true is Emmy and Bryce each holding their brother or sister in their arms...absorbing the sweetness only babies bring. I never pictured my life quite like this...especially when I was pregnant with Declan. Our house feels so empty...our family so small. I know it's because we're missing someone. The strange thing is I wanted two kids originally. A boy and a girl...perfect. Now...I could see myself having two more kids. How strange. Life experience can alter so many ideals we concoct in our heads. I just hope I get to actually experience having three at home.
Lisa read THE MAZE RUNNER. Loved it. Gave it to Chris. He liked my writing, but didn't think that book was right for them. Meanwhile, I had finally finished another book called THE WORLD SIFTER. Lisa liked it, but not as much as MAZE. She didn't even give it to Chris.
To start, Chef Tal lays out a complicated process for marinating mushrooms. First, you saute shallots and garlic in olive oil. Then you add white wine, water, white wine vinegar, and Cajun seasoning. That mixture simmers for 20 minutes, during which time it makes your entire kitchen smell yummy.
To seek Christ’s consolation?
I don't mind the snow or the cold so much. What I mind is not being able to help clear it all up. My husband dutifully goes out and clears the driveway, starts and clears off my car, and puts down the doggie safe icemelt.
I started this blog for the primary purpose of writing 90 days worth of meditations from John’s Gospel. Those meditations coincided with a 4 1/2 month sermon series from the same and were posted here under the heading “90 Days with Jesus”.
This took some tremendous patience on Frank’s to communicate, however, because it was very difficult to make out anything that he shouted. This was due to his peculiar accent and cadence of speech, which he most likely picked up during his years of tutelage at the feet of a great karate master, or perhaps during his childhood, when he watched too many Godzilla movies or un-dubbed anime shows. The accent was a bizarre witches brew of Japanese, midwestern and southern accents, all delivered with a Japanese pacing. The shouting didn’t aid clarity, nor did the fact that he sometimes shouted actual Japanese words. All of this added together to form an unintelligible, slightly eastern sounding babble that was lightly seasoned with Japanese and English words. This would be excusable if Frank was from Japan, but he wasn’t. He was a Caucasian male of less than average height from the greater Birmingham area, and he took to Karate like most people take to breathing. If Karate was a cocaine, then Frank would be scarface.
Another Arsenal player slams one in.
- It. is. gorgeous. The beaches in the DR are some of the most beautiful in the world and I can't think or anything more appealing right now than to lay on a beach with a cool drink in hand. With the hubby next to me, of course :)
The woman on the checkout, an attractive, possibly Greek-looking, forty something, said, ‘Sorry about the delay.’
After seventeen-year-old Felicita’s dearest friend Ilven kills herself to escape an arranged marriage, Felicita chooses freedom over privilege. She fakes her own death and leaves her sheltered life as one of Pelimburg’s magical elite behind. Living in the slums, scrubbing dishes for a living, she falls for charismatic Dash while also becoming fascinated with vampire Jannik. Then something shocking washes up on the beach: Ilven's death has called out of the sea a dangerous wild magic. Felicita must decide whether her loyalties lie with the family she abandoned . . . or with those who would twist this dark power to destroy
09/09/2011 BUY 0.01 audusd 1.04806
Deputies issued McGee an appearance ticket for the violation of NYS Agriculture and Markets Law Article 26, Section 353, Failure to Provide Sustenance. McGee is scheduled to appear in the Town of Georgetown Court next week.
“You put the program on a cartridge that you put inside your Game Boy, and then you can make music on the Game Boy,” he says. “You can enter notes into it, sounds, and you can take these notes and combine them in little arrangements or a complete song, with four channels.”
Cook 3/4 cup long grain rice in 1 quart of water. Don't let dry out. When the rice absorbs most of the water and looks creamy, add 1 quart of milk and bring back to a boil.
She knew that with the most painful certainty.
On this Easter weekend, I have memories of standing outside Mamaw’s house, in front of whatever shrub was in full bloom, dressed in my best suit and tight, shiny black shoes, getting my picture made with mean sisters, bossy cousins, and everyone else in the family. So many pictures I couldn’t see after the flashes were finished. But glad to be finished with the pretty part of Easter, we were able to tear off our ties, change our shoes, shed coats and sometimes shirts, and get busy hiding and finding eggs all over the yard, stopping only long enough to eat jelly beans and chocolate bunny ears. Wearing black beads and needing naps, we made the long journey home complete with baskets of cracked, colored eggs we would keep for weeks in our treasure troves. Just a word of advice, don’t eat those things after the third day. Take my word on that.
A nurse came out after what seemed an eternity and asked the man across from me how he was doing. The man smiled genuinely and said he was doing great *tears*, he was doing great. The nurse smiled back, that knowing smile that I'm sure she couldn't help, but it made me cringe.
Cucumber boats: Slice a cucumber lengthwise and scoop out the seeds. Fill each “boat” with healthy tuna or chicken salad.
Then the heavens broke forth and the Lord heard my cries... okay, so it wasn't THAT SERIOUS...but man alive, you'd think I had won the lottery the day I found IT... the piece I was dying to have...the one that I thought nothing else could compare or replace.
I wonder why they decided to name it Moon. I probably should know this and may have at one time...but if so this information must be housed in the section of my brain known as The Sieve. The Sieve keeps expanding the older I get and the more I have to juggle. Pretty soon I'll just be walking around with a colander for a head.
Janika and Gabrielle (9 months)
International Symbol for Marriage :
It took me a while to book it. My husband finally persuaded me (mainly by saying he would pay!). And it took me a while to get there. At least six months which, Deborah says, is probably the most far advanced booking she's ever had! I just had to make sure I was doing the right thing. With a young daughter, and a full time job, I had to be certain that this was okay.
The gang life is not glorified. There is bloodshed, deaths, drug deals, arrests. But, the gang members are not vilified; this isn't a message book. It's clear that the gang meets a need; for Alex, it's a way to protect his family. For some of his friends, the gang becomes the family they lack.
“By this the love of Elohim was manifested in us, that Elohim has sent His only brought-forth Son into the world, in order that we might live through Him. In this is love, not that we loved Elohim, but that He loved us and sent His Son to be an atoning offering for our sins. ” (1 John 4:9-10 The Scriptures 1998+)
tom-toms, gongs, celesta and xylophone. Cowell was particularly
7th May – London, The Macbeth – w/ Trippple Nippples
MUSIC!!! (it can seriously turn my entire mood around!)
6) Sesame oil – 1 teaspoon
Welcome to blogging, Jack: see you at The Session.
Really? REALLY????
And I even couldn’t do that right. While I still have your attention I wanna recommend some film where you really feel that close romantic thug of your heartstrings before they snap. Carrie, this all everything worked out for her. Next up is Blue Valentine which is very uplifting. Really, all this whole video, who cares. If you want more optimistic advice just follow some tips for life on twitter.
“I’m not glamorising crime; I’m not making it seem good; I’m showing the bare elements of drug addicts, a young lad being blinded by the lights and peer pressure, fast cars, fast money and I’m showing the real gritty parts of real life. All real.
We still haven’t started trying for another baby yet, in case anyone is wondering. I feel like this summer would be the best time, even if I’m not exactly where I want to be health-wise, I just can’t put it off forever. That deadline is quickly approaching, however. I’ve just started a “couch to 5k” program. My friend Cassie and I are planning to do a 5k in about 9 weeks. I am hoping that I can really make a habit of exercise and continue on after I get pregnant.
Archaeologist, art historian, and curator Sheila Campbell has published widely on ancient and contemporary mosaics and Byzantine art. A Professor Emerita at the Pontifical Institute of Mediaeval Studies, Toronto, she has curated many exhibitions, including a showcase of the Scuola di Mosaici (Friuli, Italy) at the Royal Ontario Museum.
it was very sweet to see my mom and her sister holding up their giant stockings together!
In the middle of our meal, we started to hear these African drums from afar but getting closer. Around the corner came three cast members from different places in Africa playing a tune for all of the guests... or so we thought. They stopped right at our table and played a special birthday song just for Barbara. I'd never seen a restaurant have such a unique birthday celebration for a guest. We were all really amazed and felt like it was more personal that just some cheesy Applebees-like chant.
1 reinforces
Or more precisely...one quarter of Reverieme. Or was it?
I know you are enjoying the everlasting Light in which you now bask. You will show me around won’t you?
I sit and cry, often. For one, I feel like a complete failure as a parent. I can't potty train my son. I've read every book, I've read every article. I've read blogs, I've read magazines, I've read the "experts" and I have a degree in psychology for Pete's sake. Can it really be that hard to help my child go poop in the potty?
Bring a large pot of lightly salted water to boil. Add the spaghetti and cook according to the directions on the package; about 5-8 minutes.
holds the dream of
Bucket-top StowAway. 18 compartments for gear and baits. Removable floor for bucket access. Two layers of compartments and general storage. Fits most standard 5-gallon buckets (bucket not included) Forrest Green/Clear. 12″ Diameter x 3.75″ H.
7. When was your latest “Ah-ha!” resto moment? What sparked it?
No, the early stars played live. Every night. They learned their craft. They earned their acclaim.
Have a lovely rest of the week, everyone!
I'm watching another dog named Madison. But I'm only watching her for a week. I watch another dog Bella and I've been watching her since I was 8 years old.
Pants : Dots
Again, what will you do?
27. Wasn't That a Party? -- Scooter Lee
14-29. August 2010
Pepperton UK is a veggie restaurant and cafe in Selhurst. Its as easy two minute walk from Selhurst station and on the 75 and 157 bus routes, so its pretty easy to get to. As well as the food this doubles as art gallery – the displays change regularly and are spread over a couple of floors so you can have a meal or a coffee and have a wander round looking at pictures.
Subject material is a significant issue in Search engine optimisation. Target on a key phrase to hold your subject material small and sweet. There really should not be any grammatical glitches. When you subject material is properly published, you will uncover a whole lot of results undertaking lookup motor optimization.
@ Paris, day 2
No 'Succinctly Yours' today as I was out all day yesterday enjoying myself, so didn't get time to write one. Instead I thought I'd tell you what I've been up to for the past few weeks.
Iron Springs Pub & Brewery Epiphany Ale
Tom Crean’s life and times have been defined by Midwestern values. Crean grew up in one of America’s classic university towns and attended Mount Pleasant (Michigan) High School, a large, over-achieving, tradition-laden institution that has produced Rhodes Scholars, Metropolitan Opera stars, Grammy Winners, Emmy Winners, PGA and LPGA players, world-class academicians, state champions, national champions and All Americans. Crean didn’t play much basketball at MPHS, he wasn’t tall or talented enough to start, but he resolved to accomplish one career goal; coaching. He picked a good place to start, coaching the Mt. Pleasant Oilers from whence he’d come.
The needle shapes are calcium sulfate crystals, the larger conchoidal shapes are silica particles. The black stuff in between is empty space – filled with water when hydrated, air when it is not. That’s definitely porous. Porosity changes the thermal profile of the investment. More porous means less density, and less thermally conductive. On the other hand, highly porous materials reduce crack propagation. The "holes" tend to stop cracks - similar to drilling a hole at the end of a crack in a piece of glass or fatigued metal.
I love the Son.
“Symptoms include extreme suspiciousness, conspiracy-mongering, delusional thought patterns, staunch “us against them” mentality, withdrawal from reality, and often religious fanaticism.”
Well no, it’s not like that, because according to the principles of homeopathy the more diluted a substance is, the stronger its effect. So the natural progression from that would turn out to be something like…
If the voltage increases, power consumption also increases. If the same 3 Ohms load is running in 24 volts, then
Ever lost touch,
* Webmaster
so Christ was sacrificed once to take away the sins of many people;
snap cap sizes. A size 16 snap is what you would commonly
and I revel in its spicy sweet kiss
Please call 718-222-4111 x250 to reserve your seat. Tours book up fast, so call today! $25 BHS members, $30 non-members.
Elmo - Summer cut at 4.861 x 4.111 and then I hid the contour.
In our opinion, Gardner’s approach of self-publishing books and then citing himself as an authoritative reference in the scholarly literature went beyond simple self-aggrandizement; it was frankly misleading. We agree with Ms. Bruch that the inaccurate portrayal of PAS as an accepted and credible diagnosis gets it wrong on many levels. http://www.jaapl.org/content/40/1/127.full
The villagers took them in reluctantly, and there was much resentment. They had to work the rice fields where they suffered the cuts and backache of harvesting rice. Soon after that the internments began and the camp system was ready to receive its first victims. Deported at age 21, Savathy Kim spent four years of her life as prisoner of a “Korngchalat”, a forced labour camp.
Still will I cry, while my best hopes lie shattered,
Backing Paper & Sentiment - Craftwork Cards.
Today is the day that I find the smell in the kitchen, and clean it.
293Thy oaths I quit, thy memory resign;
1/2 cup salt
Qualcomm’s Tagg: Like ‘Find My iPhone’ for Your Dog – This collar-mounted gizmo uses GPS to help you track down pets who have roamed too far from home.
1 1/2 tbsp butter or olive oil
Later on in the conversation, we were saying more about our society and its view of birth and death now that those events seem to be relegated to a hospital. Again, Tamara was blessed with the words that night:
Here are some reasons why I feel contention with the above commercial:
This has been one of those weeks where I found plot holes and things that didn't go together. I had to cut, paste, delete.
I stamped the little bird onto the tag and then stamped it again on patterned paper, this was so that I wouldn’t lose the little eyelash of the bird. I stamped and cut out the word ‘smile’. The right hand page is just a die cut label with a leaf cut out from Blissful Botanicals and a flower cut out from Judy’s Blooms. The little pocket was very simply made by cutting a wider sheet of paper, folding it back and attaching it with double sided tap on three sides, leaving the top open. I then cut a circle using a hole punch to create a pocket for my tag.
I found one of my favorite IPod Beads and glued that on to the patch.
Raven haired with blues eyes with a deep love of the kitch and vintage.
Who best can drink his cup of woe,
The purpose of a query letter is to entice an agent to read on. This is a packing list instead of a of a word picture of the contents of the box, or a list of ingredients for a cake rather than a taste of the cake itself.
Footwear: Taupe ballet flats from JONES BOOTMAKER
Schools from all over Indiana and even outside the state (Alaska!) are supposed to be there. The day starts by signing up for short interviews with prospective employers, and then the rest of the time is spent hobnobbing or attending to your scheduled interviews.
The modelling took around 25 hours, all told. I tried to keep as close to the real thing as possible but there are always going to be discrepancies when you only have one reference image. I couldn’t see the rudder and prop that well, for example, so had to give it my best guess. The real sub is actually a squashed cylinder, a bit like a fish, but I wanted a fuller shape. And for the final image we wanted the sub to be a blimp, so it needed balloons!
I have decided to take a blog break. You may have seen it coming, I've been thinking about it for months, although it's not been till this last week or two that it's been more difficult to get my posts together. The main reason is I want to reclaim the time that has been spent on-line and use it in real life. I don't know if I'll give blogging up altogether, come back, or reinvent my blog in some other form. I'm considering just putting up posts with more major projects, as well.
After last week, this one was easy. I knew before I was even done reading the email exactly what image was going to use. Then I started looking through my Lightroom catalog and found several more that I thought fit.
In the first 20 minute round, the boys beat us by a HUGE margin, although a lot of it could be put down to cheating. They had the frustrating habit of running up to us, grabbing our guns to prevent us shooting them, and shoot us. Repeatedly. It was really fun though, if not a little scary, as we turned corners and found boys running towards us in the dark, shooting wildly. It seemed like my gun was incapable of shooting, but I decided afterwards it was just bad aim.
“Sample some of Portland’s best food carts and learn the science behind the food on OMSI’s Culinary Science Stage.
For indigenous tourism pros in Australia: How satisfied or dissatisfied are you with local tourism development and promotion? Do you have suggestions on making things better?
Not to be outdone by the Shaivites, the Iyengar Design Institute Of Typography submitted their stylized vision for the Rupee symbol. Being a politically shrewder lot, they pointed out that the choice of English will keep the Southern political parties happy and what’s even better, the “naamam” part even looks slightly like the rising sun. But it was rejected on the basis of a massive protest by the Association of Pencil Manufacturers (led by Natraj) who complained that the symbol looked too much like the nib of a pen and therefore was offensive to pencils.
- The Tribune is reporting that the Ricketts family and key staff members are expected to travel to their new site in the Dominican Republic. Brett at Bleacher Nation has a great take on Ricketts trip to the Dominican and other possible reasons he is making the trip down there.
There’s ane intill the ladye’s bower,
People often don't think about where they can position themselves for where they can get a photo where something in front is in focus and everything else is blurry. You can still see the background, but it's creating a sort of lost feeling sometimes. When things are blurred in your depth of field and they create a pattern that is interesting, it's called bokeh. Generally this happens with the bokeh in the background but it can be used in the foreground instead. Use depth of field and get into the mode of the subject you're photographing.
But is it a good deal, really? Sure it's about $100 cheaper for 1000 rounds, but I've had personal trouble with remanufactured stuff.
Do not deselect yet!!, Effects, Eye Candy 4000, Gradient Glow, Glass, 79.52, 100,
For Fuck SAKE! Had to hit the gas in order to avoid :1 Dip shit in SUV pushing me into the car next to me. Had the space, it was safe. Signal on. ( Yes. ALL cars have them. (Though anything worth over $50gs doesn’t seem to have any.) 2: Avoid having the minivan behind me getting comfortable wit the dog in the back seat.
Writer and Researcher.
I'm glad I caught them this day.
Two diaper changes, two little boys in their cribs, two dogs let out to answer calls of nature, two little girls ensconced on the couch with two cups of milk, one pillow retrieved from our bed and one television tuned to channel 257 for a little Tom and Jerry break later, we all settled in for a little midday rest. I have discovered that 45 is a “magic” number for me; if I’m able to be horizontal for that many minutes in the middle of the day, my mood is significantly improved.
May we all be this strong when faced with any hardship that may come our way, whether it be in our marriages, with our children, our family, our jobs, our discontent with our personal self-satisfaction, our emotional desire to be something other than what we are. This Is Not The Story You Think It Is. This is a book for all women, and even all men. It’s for all people dealing with a personal crisis. It’s empowering, it’s powerful. It’s a self-strengthening book that everyone can take something away from.
So, remember how one of my New Year's resolutions was to blog more? Well, it just goes to show that I shouldn't go around making resolutions! I apologize. I'm currently suffering from a very un-busy month (which, while it doesn't provide much fodder for the blog, is welcome after so many months of non-stop action!), and a lack of creativity.
(a) Any action which has the aim or effect of depriving them of their integrity as distinct peoples, or of their cultural values or ethnic identities;
I've made no secret of my admiration from this mighty micro, and I stand by my prediction that this will go down in history as one of the most successful small breweries of its generation.
If you despise the taste of Brussels Sprouts, I urge you to keep reading. Seriously, I am a convert of the I-Hate-Brussels-Sprouts Camp. Actually, I think Brussels sprouts are kinda cute-- like miniature cabbages, don't you think? To some palates, they can pack a very strong taste, I admit. My conversion began when I made Roasted Brussels sprouts with bacon. Bacon makes most anything taste good? Are you feeling me? Then, Bobby Flay changed my opinion of Brussels sprouts forever. I think he changed a multitude of hearts when he made this recipe on a recent Thanksgiving Feast Showdown with the very popular "Pioneer Woman". I watched the episode (and I won't tell you who won, lest I spoil it for you). I was intrigued by the components that Bobby Flay used-- Pomegranate Molasses... interesting, I thought. Vanilla Bean -Pecan butter... Bobby, you're really talking to me, now. He then sprinkles the roasted Brussels sprouts with pomegranate arils (that would be the beautiful seeds) For a final Ta-Da, freshly grated orange and lime zest. Count me in!
I always wonder what would happen if I got stopped by a cop on the road trips I take when I come home, as I routinely go at least 85 mph and this time I really pushed it. I have my Norwegian driver's license, I kind of want to see what they would do if they did stop me and that's what I gave them. But it hasn't happened in 9 years of me having it. Hmm. Maybe it's a magic bullet of anti-cop-stoppingness? I really liked my rental car this time around, a VW CC Turbo. Fun and it has this crazy gearbox that can be manual (without clutch, but you do shift) or automatic. It could be the ultimate compromise between my lust for sporty cars and Rich's desire for lazy marshmallow automatics.
OK, back to the same old same old, with hopefully not another month between updates!
Best Bet: Animated Film
I am REALLY happy with how this card turned out. The colors, the layout and super cute image! So darn cute I could just squeal. Ahem. OK, little too much excitement there. The layout is from another fabulous sketch - this one is from The Sweet Stop. And I did both the piecing and the piercing.
-double axe handle by Miz off the top for a 2.
Four large olive trees laid out in a bosque fashion provides a knitted canopy of shade to sit beneath on a hot summer day. These trees were irrigated for the first year and are now no longer dependent on any irrigation.
…no.
At the Penny Arcade Expo we saw how a few companies decide to give their games an extra edge by putting their console game into an arcade cabinet. The games which were showcased in such cabinets probably won’t ever see an official release but the understanding that an arcade cabinet attracts attention in a way that a standard kiosk setup does not was certainly highlighted. Now the same idea has moved over to the indie games scene where a small group of independent game developers found a way to grab some attention towards their games at the Fan Expo in Toronto. By using an old arcade cabinet, they converted it to play a number of indie games that were brought to the show and as a result it helped give those games some extra attention them might not have received otherwise. As it turned out, the indie developers got a taste of what an arcade location test can be like, which is different than putting out something like a public online beta. Maybe one of them will consider making an indie arcade title, although that can be a whole new challenge in itself as not everyone makes it there either since you need a way to get the game out there which involves selling hardware in addition to software and that takes funding.
sheeps wool hair/beard,
I will simplify: writing is rooted in language and observation. Writers write to convey real or imagined information. Readers interpret.
That Hideous Strength – Camilla – Latin/Italian, “young servant” – Is it bizarre to name a daughter for a character who likes weather? Very well, then, I shall be bizarre.
After Walter dropped the girls off in Virginia Highlands, they walked down the row of bars, smokey and music filled. They enter the first bar, The Dark Horse, and were met by a familiar college party scene. They left after only a few minutes, deciding they had graduated from the scene of dumb drunk girls and eager boys. (Ok, maybe not, but they just weren't feeling it last night.) Their ears led them down the street to a New Orleans blues club, Blind Willie's, where there were some pretty sweet sounds coming from within. Drinks were ordered, small talk was made. But neither Jeannie or PeyPey were having the time of their lives, which they were desperate to have, having had such an awesome time at the concert. Now, don't get the wrong idea, they had fun - the beer was cold, and there was some good people watching; but it just wasn't meeting their expectations. So at about 1:15 a.m., they made the call to Walter to take them back to their hotel.
I added two of the pictures and lowered the opacity level enough to see through them. Next I created a colored rectangle for the hydrangeas and put it in the center. Using the same color I created a border. I have learned how to use the eyedropper tool so I could choose the purple from the flower and use it for the borders.
See that white little square, bottom, middle of the paintings? Yes, this pic shows a size comparison between the largest paintings I’ve created and the 8 inch or 20cm square canvases that I will work on for the 30x30x30. Size is only one of my challenges!
*Prevent artheriosclerosis
Network manager Adrian McKill also believes that by networking with other projects, we can help in the fight for social justice.
‘And then when she was on board, I had to stop her from rolling off the trolley, and lighting cigarettes, and throwing the contents of her bag about.’
It's lovely that you've managed to keep her innocent for so long. These days, most children have had the rudimentary "talk" by age 7 or so, and because of all the hormones in our milk products, the rest have had the full explanation, complete with a power point show, by age 9.
‘It’s so simple really,’ she whispers. ‘I never really knew. Just breathe. Don’t die. Just breathe.’
My plan of having no checked baggage worked well. that and online check-ins, zowie, what a stress-saver. Being a man I can contemplate two weeks in a foreign country out of one carry-on.
Do not be conformed to this world, but be transformed by the renewing of your mind, so that you may discern what is the good, pleasing, and perfect will of God. (Romans 12:2)
My ideas would be like demons rushing from a hellish cave, and my fellow intellectuals, startled by their truth and enormity, would try to bottle them up before they spread.
-no clue/no glimmer of what’s to come June 1 (financially speaking)
Bullfinch, Thomas. Bullfinch’s Mythology.
I then layered it on white card stock with turquoise vellum (like tracing paper) and more white edged with a Martha Steward around the page punch set.
I thought back. Yes, it was true. We had bought it on my card, as ED's bank card wasn't suitable it seems for an online transaction. They needed a card that took money out of a bank, as opposed to a card that took money out of a bank.
Well our VC Rocks group started up for returning members last month. New members are starting this month. During last month there were several Preview Challenges. I made this card for the reason I fell in love with stamping. I remember when I first started stamping that I use to love the creating beautiful colorful cards. Here is what I created for this challenge.
I hope everyone that celebrates Thanksgiving had a great day. This year was a little different in my house. It was just us... The day before I asked my husband and two sons to write in a piece of paper 3 things they were thankful for in the year 2011. Before blessing the meal we proceeded to take turns and recite our lists. I just wanted to remember this year and our many blessings. We've had some difficult times, but we still know that we are blessed. And of course Ivonne was on my list. I am so thankful for her being in my life, for our kids getting to know each other better, for this blog a labour of love, designed and built by her; and for her being that sister sent from above.
What is a bubble catcher? Someone who catches the bubbles and counts how many they can break between their palms.
the MTA accepted Forest City Ratner's bid of $50 million for the LIRR's rail yard, even though an appraisal valued it at $214.5 million. Extell, a Manhattan developer, later submitted a competing bid for $150 million. The MTA rejected that bid, but did negotiate with Forest City Ratner to get it to double its bid to $100 million. The MTA then accepted Ratner's new bid, even though it was $50 million less than Extell's.
To say that her face was a mask of horrified surprise at my request was an understatement. Go through the Fast Track without the official right to use it? Just because my little boy needed the bathroom? The answer was an unequivocal no. Instead we were sent to the back of beyond – my younger son’s legs crossed as he walked – to find a toilet that was open. And I was left asking myself where on earth I had thought I was flying into...
Here is just a peek at how dingy the old colour looked compared to the new (the old is in the middle in case you can't tell!)....
Some people don’t want to chance it, they’d rather keep their original equipment. I couldn’t deal. After a while, after a couple years of transition, it just didn’t make sense to me. Especially once I found out that I was interested in straight boys. That was another thing, yes? And especially among the older TS women of my generation, it’s really common to either find another woman to get into a relationship with, or else to change the nature of the relationship with the woman they’re married to, and become a lesbian. But me, who had never been femme when I was a guy, found that yup, I wanted to be with guys now. (And I found a whole secret self that had been interested in them all along, but I’d been hiding that info from myself. Which was really weird. Like finding another set of rooms in the back of your mind, furnished and with a history of their own.)
This year I plan to try a mix of garlic and chili peppers soaked in water to spray on the plants. I had wanted to avoid this because I was worried it would affect the taste since I mostly grow edible plants but I think I’m left with no choice.
TOTAL 4,520
Employers do not own their employees, not really. An employee is a person with a mind, a spirit, a soul, as well as the physical body, all made in the image and likeness of the Divine Creator, which no employer owns. The employer has a personal, civic and social responsibility to the Divine Creator of All, to take proper care of the human life, which the employer does not own, no matter what country, religion, economic status they come from. Employers in all countries, including the United States of America, do not have a God-given right to treat the human workforce inhumanly, or with inequality in pay or otherwise.
You’re an angel, you,
So. I had a couple of books that I was SO excited about them, so I decided to take some time off and ENJOY them. And I also may have gotten slightly addicted to Buffy: The Vampire Slayer. Seriously, if you haven’t seen this series, you are missing out on possibly (probably) one of the most awesome things in the universe; awesomeness out of all things awesome can not be overstating it.
As for my relative, he has to want to change as much as we all want him to. We're all here, waiting with open arms to support him, but I'm trying to get him to understand that zero tolerance, as painful as it will be, is where he has to start.
My husband loves books more than just about anything and I have a pretty big collection of books myself. So this was a really fun project for us to work on together. He's a big fan of the arches and it's fun to finally have a wall of shelves big enough to store all of our books.
On Monday, I attended the Solihull Children's Book Award. It was won by Gill Lewis for her amazing book Sky Hawk. Fiona Dunbar and I were given bottles of fizzy booze to take away for being runners-up.
The Crypt is thought to date back to the 6th century, there are massive wooden beams and the walls are eight feet thick. It is still in use as a chapel and the font is down here.I think that the two statues in the window embrasures are St Francis and Our Lady. It was very dark down there so the other photos I took are too murky to post.
I've changed out of my cute "outfit" into a pair of fleece lined sweats and I've taken some Sudafed. Now I feel like I've dried up like an old prune. No more tears or saliva either. And I feel like I'm underwater.
Almanac. Rodney King. April 29, 1992: southern California jury acquitted policemen involved in Rodney King incident. South Central LA looting. Reginald Denny incident.
Sally's Tomato Sauce
Lanny’s Alta Cocina Mexicana
Vogue's history form the beginnings is now available online. From the very first issue! It's fabulous to see original vintage pieces, art deco, jazz age, color photography... love the artistic feel! What a revolution!
I love to cheat on dinner some nights and eat cheesy popcorn from a bag. Oh, and some nights, it's potato chips with onion dip. The onion dip is homemade; how salty could that be? (The chips, the chips!) And the other day when Cranky brought home a can of greasy peanuts, I ate a few. The salt is visible, and excessive in my opinion, but I ate some.
Best Regards, Kirsten
The two books were “The Immortal Life of Henrietta Lacks,” by Rebecca Skloot and “State of Wonder,” by Ann Patchett. The only connection between the two books, other than my book clubs, was that they both involved some discussion of medical testing against the will of the patient. In “State of Wonder,” this was one of 200 or so themes in the book, and in “Henrietta Lacks” it was the central theme. You can probably deduce at this point which book I liked. This post will be about “Henrietta Lacks” and later today, I’ll post another about “State of Wonder.” Five posts in a week. Take that, April slump.
And to our mom’s across the country, Ursula and Dottie enjoy your special day and know we love you and are grateful to have you in our lives.
Anna Chancellor and Nicholas Farrell lead the casts in these plays which
It don't make no difference, escaping one last time
Okay, maybe that's a bit snarky, but it is also accurate.
In a very rare move for me I have used light pastel shades to colour the image using Promarkers and Flexmarkers. I have selected papers to match from the Spring Feast & Boho Chic First Edition pads by Dovecraft. There is a lovely assortment of papers, many with a subtle glitter sheen and I have added Stickles glitter glue to the centre of the flowers and the buzzy bee wings.
The Motorola RAZR MAXX comes in with a 4.3-inch qHD display. This might seem lacking when facing the 720p beasts out there, but the 540 x 960 pixels should be more than enough. The Samsung Galaxy S2 is still rocking 480 x 800 pixels and that does not make it a lesser device.
It will be no surprise to hear that one year later I returned to Crete to stock up on my supplies- and I actively encourage other family member to visit Greece (with my shopping list) in order to satisfy my passion.
It feels like a completely different show from the Saban dub, which is understandable I guess. The nice thing about it is that the names of the characters are generally the same, except for Tai/Kari’s last name which is Yagami in the original and Kamiya in the dub. They’re just given nicknames in the dub.
But little Lord Jesus
Overall Impression (0-3): Since Endeavour is Ben E. Keith's big "F U" to anywhere off the Interstate, I don't feel bad about giving 'em a big "F U" back. 0 points
2. Where is the healing for me?
The NY Times reports that support for the rigid implementation of Shariah in Nigeria is down. Readers will likely remember the fiasco that occurred a couple of years ago, where Nigeria became one of the main perpetrators, along with Taliban, in the negative image that Islamic law has been receiving. Obviously a carefully calculated and deliberate defacement of Islam.
We all love Summer, but we don’t love what it means for our skin. A lot of prep goes into making our limbs look soft, smooth and blemish free in time for the days when jumpers and tights can be buried in the back of our wardrobes. So when my very good friend had some great products to try that promise to scrub away dull Winter skin I of course, opened up a guest blog post spot just for her!
Before pacifiers were invented- the breast was what a newborn was given for comfort. It is part of being a mother- to comfort your child.
This is a forum post written by a person who was approached by a "who's who" organization. Her detailed account mirrors conversations (That I've read on the internet, but which have since been deleted.) that other "nominees" have had in the past with organizations like this.
Factor B brown brown
Lots of feathers, peeling paint-like look, erosion, drippy, layered goodness. The final book would have so much texture and natural images.
Here are my finds......
Son House greets his "discoverers", he hadn't known he that he was lost.
Milk and 8oz of soy milk. I add ½ cup of frozen mango or strawberries to
In 1888, following her mother's sudden death, 17-year-old Arabella Sharp goes to live with her grandmother in a posh London neighborhood.
He pulled a small purple package from his bag and handed it to her.
The night before last I was standing outside my house having a cigarette when my neighbour jogged past. She paused for breath and said " I suppose you are going to laugh at me now?"
sated by his manic insistence and with
When I started writing, I thought it would be really cool to do author visits. As a teacher, I loved teaching writing and wouldn't it be even more exciting to get to teach writing as a guest author? And in between writing, I daydreamed about the day those school visits would happen.
I've been talking and emailing a few friends who have been through this and they have all found it quite hard to settle back in to UK life. I know what to expect, and I am planning on launching myself into a few projects as soon as I return to try and meet new people and offset some of the sadness I think I am going to feel.
08. My Boy
My journey through The Thirteenth Tale, which was my most recent read before embarking on the guilt-fest The Science of Parenting (do NOT read this book if you have ever let your child cry), reminded me a lot of my experience with Sarah's Key. I got swept up in both stories and couldn't put them down, but was kind of left voicing an anti-climactic, "Huh" at the end of each.
I guess you could say I got flowers for Mother's Day... not to mention, my very own flower fairy! I am one lucky mama :)
Half & Half/ Milk- 2-3 tablespoons
Please forgive me,
Bye^^
The carborundum print I just happened upon later in a group show. It left an impression on me as the printing plate had left an impression on the paper of the print. I do not remember the exact neutral colour. I recall only the amazing intricacy of it and that I asked the gallery assistant what it was and how it was created. Her work was like that.
- WFIU Radio: $877.00 for its Artist in the Making radio series featuring emerging artists in a variety of media.
Looking at almost 200,000 patients from 2004-2007, they combined two registries, one from the thoracic society and one from the cardiologists. Essentially, they concluded that in patients over 64 years of age, who required revascularisation non-emergently, there was a lower mortality at 4 years in the CABG group compared with PCI.
and are settled now that school
Whenever we visit Flanders, to see family and friends, there is ALWAYS that pull towards the beach and the sea. We love it.
The Importance of Social Media in our society
As I mentioned in the previous post, I’ve fallen in love with the Swap-bot. There are so many incredible people and amazing swaps – it’s hard to pick just few of them (unfortunately, I have to think about the money :/). There is just one thing I don’t like – restrictions for new user. I’d love to take part in few swaps, but I don’t meet all of the criteria :(. On hand I understand it – no one wants to be flaked on, but on the other – I really want to take part in some swaps.
“Kirk’s a Buckeye through and through. He’s always been there for us, for the school and the team. He just does everything right. He represents himself and the university well. He always knows what to say and how to say it.”
We all know that Gordon Brown and his laughably inept minions pissed far more money down a variety of drains than we actually had, but what is now becoming clear is that - with the election looming - they accelerated the rate of pissing, and threw away as much of our money as they could.
.I coloutred her with promarkers...added hand made flowers made with dienamics dies,The butterflies are made using a punch .The card blank was created using nesties...The fab ribbon and buttons are from meiflower crafts
We went out for dinner last night. I had a bun-less burger with the house salad with balsamic vinaigrette. I forgot to ask them to leave off the BBQ sauce, so I ate it. I wouldn’t be surprised if it had gluten or a ton of glucose in it because my blood sugars were a bit higher than usual for after dinner. I got as high as a 12.8, which, normally I wouldn’t be terribly concerned about. However, since that’s the highest they’ve ever been since I started my Paleo Challenge, I gave myself 3 units of novorapid. They slowly started coming down, and then I gave myself the now 16 units of levemir (down from 18!)
As I mention in the post, whenever we've used up the contents of an attractive bottle, we give it a thorough sanitizing wash in the dishwasher and then store it away for later use. We've got a basement with a wall of built-in wood shelves in one corner that's perfect for this purpose, but, lacking that, you could store yours in a pantry, or even in a linen closet. The bottles come in handy for gift-giving purposes like homemade infused vinegars, as well as for prettying up homemade cleaners. It's a great way to upcycle both bottles and spray nozzles alike.
For a full description* of each, scroll down to read more about each product.
And at a time when Aun Sung Su-Kyi is on trial again and we are not to be shown any further images from Abu Ghraib we might think there's never too early an age to introduce children to the concept of Human Rights.
1/2 teaspoon caster sugar
I’ve never imagined a world without him in it.
Cheryl Bentyne,
I hadn't planned to wear a me-made outfit today because I'd had my two for this week. However, when I was hanging up clothes this morning and deciding what to wear I spotted a dress I'd made but never worn:
Uploaded by wynette26 on Sep 14, 2011
Now we are fourteen days away from the last day of school. The day I'll open up the doors for my kindergarteners for for the last time before sending them off to summer and then in the fall, their first grade teachers. Like those butterflies some are ready to fly, and some are going to need a little coaxing to know that it's really okay to spread their wings and leave the safety and comfort of my kindergarten classroom.
I take it that's a model taken from the EU commission, a model in this "post-democratic age" that we are going to see more and more. By the way, has anyone noticed this phrase "post-democratic age" being bandied about? In it's literal meaning, it means after democracy. So therefore for us to be in a post-democratic age we therefore have to be living in an age where democracy no longer exists....
Package 12 Days FULL HOURS 9900 Euros
They are like pale hair and the gutturals of dialects.
Note that this is just the air force. There are three other branches with massive programs, and there is a separate, overall public-information program under an assistant secretary of defense for public affairs in the Pentagon. In I97I, an Armed Forces Journal survey revealed that the Pentagon was publishing a total of 37I magazines at an annual cost of some $57 million, an operation sixteen times larger than the nation’s biggest publisher. In an update in I982, the Air Force Journal International indicated that the Pentagon was publishing I,203 periodicals. To put this into perspective, we may note the scope of public-information operations of the American Friends Service Committee (AFSC) and the National Council of the Churches of Christ (NCC), two of the largest of the nonprofit organizations that offer a consistently challenging voice to the views of the Pentagon. The AFSC’s main office information-services budget in I984-85 was under $500,000, with eleven staff people. Its institution-wide press releases run at about two hundred per year, its press conferences thirty a year, and it produces about one film and two or three slide shows a year. It does not offer film clips, photos, or taped radio programs to the media. The NCC Office of Information has an annual budget of some $350,000, issues about a hundred news releases per year, and holds four press conferences annually. The ratio of air force news releases and press conferences to those of the AFSC and NCC taken together are I50 to I (or 2,200 to 1, if we count hometown news releases of the air force), and 94 to I respectively. Aggregating the other services would increase the differential by a large factor.
The leftover salad also made for a wonderful afternoon snack the next day! I mixed the leftover Spicy Cantaloupe-Cucumber Salad with 3/4 of a cup of Fage Greek Yogurt and they made a great pair! The yogurt also helped relieve a bit of the heat from the peppers…
5 Tips To Improved Skin Care
In recent years, insurers have stepped up their efforts to identify fraudulent claims, which have in turn made the pro­cess even more complex—by filling con­tracts with countless options, confusing terminology, conflicting definitions of disability, criteria for exclusion, renew-ability, premium increases, riders, etc. If a “hurried” stockbroker couldn’t deal with the details of his policies when he was seemingly “healthy,” imagine how his wife must have felt when left to handle matters on her own.
And so they made camp that night in the secluded well house, and after an uneventful night, they crossed over to the “other side” of the kings Wall and made their way into the Chaos Scar, heading northwest to where they new the hill called Dragontooth squatted dourly overlooking the countryside. They could soon see it rising above the undulating fields, a tall sheer-sided pillar of stone, with rubble and trees ringing the base. A stream flowed from a crack that clove the hill in two and they began following a path that meandered along the stream bank, until they reached the base of the hill. The stream poured forth from a large cave mouth about twenty feet up, cascading down to form the stream. The wall behind the waterfall was solid, but the cave mouth above was much larger than the stream, and the Halfling Merrick was quick to ascend the rock wall and peer into the cave.
'It's going to be very difficult for me if I have to answer questions as I go along,' I said. 'If it's all the same to you, Minister, I'd prefer you to make a note of the questions, and ask me afterwards.'
You are not my friend. In fact, I have nothing for you. You make me miserable by making me feel bad about myself. You affect my emotions, my skin, my weight and my BRAIN! That is the worst part. When you come around, all my thoughts become irrational. And somehow EACH and EVERY month you manage to sneak up on me and it takes me 3 or 4 days to realize why everything has gone haywire.
So what do you think? And I promise, if you disagree, I'm not going to be like, "RAWR!" I'd like to have someone that can logically and reasonably explain to me (without the use of morals and religion) why this is a good idea. Because last time I checked, government wasn't supposed to do things because of religion. And they certainly don't care about morality.
